Police body cam video shows George Floyd struggle, then takedownGeorge Floyd's struggle with three police officers trying to arrest him, seen on body-camera video, included Floyd's panicky cries of “I'm sorry, I'm sorry” and “I'm claustrophobic!” as the officers tried to push Floyd into the back of a police car.
Biden announces huge 'once-in-a-generation' infrastructure plan
Google Maps to default to routes with the lowest carbon impactThe tech giant is using AI to improve its popular maps app to help combat climate change.
Three months on, what impact has Brexit had on UK-EU trade?
G. Gordon Liddy, Watergate mastermind, dead at 90Liddy, a former FBI agent and Army veteran, was convicted of conspiracy, burglary and illegal wiretapping for his role in the Watergate burglary.
Rights of Caruana Galizia murder suspect were not breached, says ECHR
WHO 'afraid' many European children didn't get routine jabs amid COVIDThe WHO told Euronews it is "afraid" that fewer Europeans got routine vaccinations for serious diseases, like measles, during the pandemic, which could lead to outbreaks down the line.
Witnesses say they saw George Floyd 'slowly fade away'
Activity is the ‘miracle pill’ that could save both people and planetWe spoke with Peter Walker about his new book The Miracle Pill & how increasing activity could help the environment too.
The waterborne waste collection facility making waves in LyonEvery Saturday, a large barge called River'tri docks on the Saône in Lyon to collect the locals' waste and take it to be repurposed or recycled. It's improving the city's waste disposal infrastructure and reducing pollution.
Eight people arrested in Egypt over deadly train crash
Hamilton holds off Verstappen to win tense F1 season-opener
What's it really like being a tourist in North Korea?
At least 18 people die as two trains collide in southern EgyptEgypt’s Railway Authorities issued another statement saying the accident happened when someone activated the emergency brakes of a passenger train.
Muhammad cartoons: UK education secretary condemns threats to teacher
Former factory worker takes on bookselling giants with 3-wheel carAsti is a small town in northern Italy and people cannot always find the books they want in proper book shops. So, Alessandro decided to bring literature to the local marketplace in his red three-wheeler.
Giving Indigenous groups land rights 'vital' to tackling deforestationTheir territories contain about one third of all carbon stored in the forests of Latin America and the Caribbean.
11 expert tips on how to travel like a local
The staycations boosting business in AngolaEntrepreneurs in Angola are particularly agile and innovative. Meet two such businessmen making the most out of travel restrictions to develop products for the domestic market, which had previously been imported.
Wildfire risk increases in the UK due to climate change, says studyPeriods of 'exceptional danger' could rise to four days per year on average by 2080.
Skyscraper-sized cargo ship remains wedged across Egypt's Suez Canal
Officers are back directing traffic at Rome piazzaThe traffic cops, an institution in Rome that have been around for decades, have been unable to work on the pedestal for the last year while the entire square was being repaved.
EV expansion, ski resort crisis and finding the right staff:  winter business challenges
No deadline yet for phasing out polluting cars, says EUThe European Union wants to phase out petrol and diesel cars as soon as possible, in order to meet its 2050 carbon neutrality target, but it is currently unwilling to say when exactly this will happen.
Thousands flout COVID restrictions at carnival in MarseilleIt came as more than a dozen départements in France were put under lockdown again to combat a third wave of infections.
'You're not alone': Prince Harry tells children of COVID-19 victims
Recycling batteries key to EU's electric car drive, says ministerBrussels wants the EU to become one of the world's top lithium battery producers as part of its push to get more electric cars on Europe's roads.
Mayor promises a greener future for the ancient city of Athens
Man charged with killing 8 people at Georgia massage parloursA white gunman was charged Wednesday with killing eight people at three Atlanta-area massage parlours in an attack that sent terror through the Asian American community that’s increasingly been targeted during the coronavirus pandemic.
Cartoon Movie, the pitching event raising funds for animated feature filmsCartoon Movie is an annual forum where producers of animated films can meet and find investors and distributors. Animators from all over Europe took part in the event held virtually this year.
Iceland on high alert for volcanic eruption after thousands of tremors
How to enjoy the craic and have a virtual St Patrick’s DayA virtual or socially-distanced St Patrick’s Day doesn’t have to mean less fun. Head online to enjoy the craic.
What could an anti-protest bill mean for climate activism?The bill would mean police taking a more proactive approach to dealing with “highly disruptive” protests in the UK.
All you need to know about the Dutch general election
France mulls new restrictions as intensive care units fill up
UK crime bill 'a missed opportunity' to tackle violence against womenThe murder of a young woman in London has put the issue under the spotlight.
Robotic assistance has the potential to play a key role in the fight against COVID-19The coronavirus pandemic has presented enormous challenges to healthcare providers, businesses, governments, and to the general public.
In Mitrovica, a bridge that separates Albanians and Serbs | ExtractMitrovica's Main Bridge is both a symbol of the town’s division and its most popular tourist attraction.
Surveillance video released as Ontario police search for car thievesPolice in London, Ontario, are asking for help to track down two people involved in a car theft.
At least eight people killed in a car bomb explosion in Afghanistan
How to have a local experience in a very touristy countryEuronews journalist Marta Rodríguez shares some tips on how to get the best out of a trip to her native Spain.
Plans to build an airport in Albania threatens migrating bird flywaysThe mayor of Vlora in Albania sees his region as the "future queen of the Mediterranean" and he's happy for infrastructural development to increase tourism. But plans to build an airport in an environmentally protected area are leaving bird experts horrified.
Takeaway food could have a staggering impact on your carbon footprintDelivery companies are looking for environmental solutions after the pandemic created a surge in order numbers.
MEPs vote to place carbon tax on select imports from outside EUThe European Parliament voted for the European Commission to come up with a legislative proposal to stop so-called 'carbon leakage'.
This vintage steam train in Russia takes passengers back in time
Valencia is the first city in Europe to measure tourist CO2 emissions
'Welcome to…' the world’s most unusual and unfortunate place names
UK consumers will soon have a 'right to repair' on goods they buy
EU rejects claim that European funds financed Lukashenko's 'goldmine'A new documentary film alleges that EU funds contributed to financing Lukashenko's regime and his lavish lifestyle. The bloc has rejected the accusations as "completely unfounded and baseless."
‘Tired, tacky, dangerous’: British Gas ads criticised for greenwashingThe UK's biggest energy supplier is accused of having a "worryingly simplistic" understanding of green issues.
Dozens held after Belgian-Dutch investigators crack coded networkThe vast police operations followed a two-year investigation which broke up an encrypted communications network popular with criminals.
EU nations must provide midwifery care for home births | ViewThroughout Central and Eastern Europe, institutional mechanisms are still being used to hamper midwifery practice, creating conditions where midwifery is possible in theory but not in practice.
'It's political persecution': Carles Puigdemont on losing his immunity
5 green tech start-ups out to change the world in 2021From recycling to ride sharing, these cutting edge companies are working hard to innovate the environmental sector.
Puigdemont: 'Sad day' for democracy as MEPs vote to lift immunity
Brazil judge dismisses Lula convictions, paving way for election runThe ruling opens the way for a showdown with far-right incumbent Jair Bolsonaro in next year’s elections.
'Motherhood biggest obstacle to my career,' says leading scientist"It was a very difficult time for me to balance my teaching and research activity due to the duties connected to the role of mother, but I overcame this," said Dr Maria Rosaria Capobianchi.
European Parliament to announce result of Puigdemont immunity vote
Here are 5 of Europe's unmissable road trips
MEPs must vote against lifting Carles Puigdemont's immunity | ViewMEPs will on Monday (March 8) vote on whether to lift the parliamentary immunity of their Catalan colleagues Carles Puigdemont, Toni Comín and Clara Ponsatí.
China's annual congress: What's happened so farThe weeklong meeting of the National People’s Congress, which rubber stamps policies approved by the Communist Party leadership, provides a window into government priorities.
83% of young women limit movement to avoid harassment, survey says
How to experience the world’s most beautiful country like a localEuronews journalist, Lillo Montalto Monella shares some tips on how to get the best out of a trip to Italy.
Here are 13 of the most dangerous roads in the world
Nine Romanian police officers prosecuted over violent facemask arrest
Pope Francis in Iraq for historic visit amid virus and security fears
China announces 'over 6%' economic growth target, tech plansChina’s premier announced plans to make the nation self-reliant in technology amid tension with Washington and Europe over trade, Hong Kong and human rights.
Victims of Portugal's deadly bridge collapse remembered 20 years on
Electric conversions of classic cars could grow by 500% in 2021Old-timer Rolls-Royces and Jaguars get an electric makeover by a company in Silverstone, UK.
The 6 most in-demand jobs for a greener futureHow careers in sustainability could play a massive role in the COVID-19 economic recovery.
Australia marine hotspots found to store 2bn tonnes of 'blue carbon'Three UNESCO World Heritage sites can store billions of CO2 in carbon sinks, according to a new report.
Sahara dust and traffic lead to air pollution alerts in FranceParts of France are experiencing high levels of air pollution amid a storm bringing dust from the Sahara Desert over to the country.
Fifteen dead after SUV carrying 27 people crashes in CaliforniaHospital officials believe there were 27 people in an SUV that struck a tractor-trailer in the agricultural southeastern corner of California.
Seville is turning 35 tonnes of unwanted oranges into electricityForget marmalade, this Spanish city is using oranges to make renewable biofuel.
These are the 8 cities people most want to go car-freeWe asked our followers where they wanted to see be pedestrianised. Is your hometown on the list?
US father and son extradited to Japan over Carlos Ghosn's escapeMichael Taylor and his son, Peter Taylor, will be tried on charges that they smuggled Ghosn out of the country in 2019.
20 years on, the disappeared still cast shadows in northern Kosovo
Car of the Year 2021: Toyota Yaris hybrid wins prestigious prizeToyota's fourth-generation Yaris scooped the coveted Car of the Year 2021 Award ahead of six other finalists.
Netanyahu accuses Iran of attacking Israeli-owned cargo shipThe mysterious explosion struck the Israeli-owned MV Helios Ray, a Bahamian-flagged roll-on, roll-off vehicle cargo ship, as it was sailing out of the Middle East on its way to Singapore on Friday.
Israeli-owned cargo ship docks in Dubai after mysterious blastThe unexplained blast has raised security concerns for shipping in the Gulf of Oman amid heightened tensions with Iran.
Meet the laid off cabin crew forced to start again during the pandemic
Malta police chief says all journalist murder suspects caught
How Hungary’s great lakes threaten fresh Budapest-Brussels conflict
Cecilia Bartoli: A new artistic direction for the Opera de Monte-CarloFrom 2023, the Italian mezzo-soprano, Cecilia Bartoli, will be the new artistic director of the Opera de Monte-Carlo, the first-ever woman to lead the opera house.
Illegal workers from Moldova ‘smuggled into France on fake passports’
'I'm not the same': COVID sufferer still has symptoms nearly a year on
Why 4x4 travel is the best way to discover Angola
Puigdemont vows to keep fighting after MEPs vote to lift his immunity
Three jailed for helping ex-Nissan boss Carlos Ghosn flee to LebanonThree jailed for helping ex-Nissan boss Carlos Ghosn flee to Lebanon
Reporters under fire: Journalists around the world face death threats
Mars rover's giant parachute carried secret message
Will clean energy help Bitcoin survive the green revolution?Concerns about the cryptocurrency's energy consumption have arisen after a big investment from Tesla.
San Marino buys Russia's Sputnik V after EU vaccine delivery delays
Security chiefs blame bad intelligence over US Capitol insurrectionThe former Capitol police chief and federal agencies blame each other for their failure to stop supporters of ex-President Trump from storming the building on January 6.
Tiger Woods 'fortunate to be alive' after crashing SUV in CaliforniaThe gold star had to be cut free from the wreckage and has undergone surgery for what his agent said were 'serious injuries' to his legs.
One of Latvia's richest men is jailed for bribery and money launderingThe businessman is regarded as one of the most influential figures in Latvian politics.
Forget Zoom or Teams, this video platform can plant treesHere’s how two companies have joined forces to grow an ‘Impact Forest’ that will subsidise video call carbon emissions.
Vince Muscat given 15-year jail term for killing Malta journalist
German man arrested over three high-profile money heistsThe 60-year-old man is alleged to have participated in the robberies in Cologne and Frankfurt between 2018 and 2019.
Sweden charges man for selling information to Russia
Debris falls over Netherlands after engine fire on Boeing 747 aircraft
A day in the life of a ski resort during COVID-19
Killed for campaigning: Meet the women fighting the coal giantsWomen are being killed for their environmentalism, suggesting a link between patriarchal violence and activism.
Electoral Commission members killed during Niger presidential election
Six climate-friendly ideas to take from EU green capital LahtiFinland’s ninth-largest city is, with its modest population of just 120,00 inhabitants, not used to being a capital. But this year is different. Here's why.
Princess Latifa 'being cared for at home' says UAE
Travel the UK like a local: Must-sees and best-avoided
UK Supreme Court rejects Uber appeal, ruling that drivers are workersThe decision could threaten the car service's business model and could have wider implications for the so-called gig economy.
How Bitcoin went from cowboy currency to commonplace
Thousands of CityBee users have their personal data leaked online
The iconic Acropolis in Athens is covered in snow
After nearly two decades of using the euro, is Spain finally ready to say goodbye to the peseta?
At least 20 dead as millions in US endure record cold without powerA winter storm left millions without power in record-breaking cold weather.
Uber proposes new employment framework for its European drivers
EU concerned by Germany's border closures
Carnival floats wheeled through Dusseldorf's quiet streetsNot quite the normal atmosphere in Dusseldorf this year.
Bill Gates says getting to zero emissions will be 'best thing we've ever done'
8 reasons to put Cardiff on your travel bucket list
Meet the Congolese ex-asylum seeker soon to lead a Scottish universityHuman rights lawyer Debora Kayembe will become rector of the University of Edinburgh in March.
Rio's 'bate-bolas' stage small parade despite cancelled carnivalThe world-famous Brazilian festival is not happening this year amid the pandemic, but some still dressed up in their exuberant, hand-made costumes for a symbolic celebration.
Sambistas perform to open Rio's would-be carnival season
Car-nival season in Germany as revellers confined to their vehiclesEach car was allowed to hold a maximum of three persons from two different households and the fans were asked to stay inside their cars for the entire concerts.
Small tornado leaves a path of destruction in TurkeyIt hit late on Thursday and uprooted trees, blew off roof tiles, swept up cars and knocked down a crane. At least four boats capsized.
Millions of CO2 emissions come from failed driving tests, says studyA new report assesses the impact of failed driving tests on carbon emissions and how the pandemic plays a part.
Tornado causes injuries and topples crane in western TurkeyIt struck in the coastal town of Çeşme, near Izmir, uprooting trees, capsizing yachts and knocking down a crane.
UK has no 'roadmap' towards electric car usage by 2030In ten years, no new petrol or diesel cars will be on sale in Britain. But is this target achievable?
These baby pandas will make your Chinese New Year
Would you brave the temperatures of the coldest village on earth?
Serbia's Vucic: ‘We had to take care of ourselves’ in vaccine rollout
Macho men, princesses and ghosts: Myanmar protesters get creativeThe situation is so bad, "even the introverts are here", as one demonstrator's poster put it.
How to travel safely with children in 2021
Danish submarine killer sentenced to 21 months for prison escape
Check out these video clips of the snow in Europe right now
Snowstorm brings parts of Netherlands and Germany to a standstill
Gay couple in 'mortal danger' in Chechnya after arrest in Russia — NGO
This library is paving the way to lower carbon architectureThe design of the Thabo Mbeki Presidential Library is based on a 2,000-year-old building technique.
One protester on why he took to the streets over Dutch COVID curfew"Why do we need to first vaccinate 90-year-olds?" asked Marcel R. "From my point of view, no one needs to live to 110. I'd rather my children be able to go to a café or a concert."
Scottish police probe 'linked' deaths of two women and a manTwo women died after being found injured, one from stab wounds, while a man was also killed in a fatal road accident nearby. Police are linking the incidents.
These are the 6 most romantic cities in EuropeParis isn't the only city for lovers this Valentine's day. What about visiting lesser known Dubrovnik or Verona?
Iranian diplomat jailed for 20 years for planned attack in FranceAn Iranian diplomat was sentenced to the maximum 20-year prison term by a Belgian court for planning an attack against opponents of the Tehran regime in France in 2018.
Myanmar blocks Facebook amid growing resistance to coup
Bulgaria accused of €6 million police vehicle fraud involving EU cash
Man arrested in Toulon after severed head found in cardboard boxThe man was arrested in Toulon after a severed head was found in a cardboard box that had been thrown out of a window of a flat.
Can the UK be rid of petrol and diesel cars by 2030?The UK is expected to stop selling petrol and diesel cars by 2030. But some car manufacturers are dubious about whether this is possible. Stellantis has even said it could force one of its UK factories to close.
This groundbreaking rocket uses carbon neutral biofuelThe bio-derived fuel was created using a renewable ingredient commonly found on farms.
Vaccine brings hope to Spanish care homes devastated by COVID-19
Carbon capture and storage: Villain or hero of the climate crisis?Greenpeace says we shouldn't be spending money on tech that keeps us "locked into the fossil fuel era".
Most of Europe's electricity came from renewable sources in 2020Solar and wind power are helping green energy to grow in the EU.
In France's poorest region, the COVID-19 vaccination drive strugglesThe coronavirus was initially widely seen as the great equalizer, infecting rich and poor. But studies have since shown that some people are more vulnerable than others, including the world's poorest.
Get into beach-based working with these 7 digital nomad destinations
Europe's first digital nomad village is opening on a stunning island
First solar-powered car made out of trash invented in Sierra LeoneA 24-year-old man has come up with a solution to the increasing problem of pollution in Freetown.
WHO team visits Wuhan hospital that had early COVID patients
One student injured in knife incident at Swedish schoolAuthorities have arrested a suspect in their 20s on suspicion of preparing acts of murder and arson.
Can the EU Green Deal empower business and consumer change?
'We can't wait any longer': Biden signs orders on climate crisisThe directives aim to offset the worst effects of global warming, and include plans to conserve land and water, double offshore wind energy, and move to an all-electric federal vehicle fleet.
German prosecutors charge woman with planning far-right attack
Why the riots in the Netherlands go beyond a COVID curfewViolence rocked Dutch towns and cities for successive nights after a curfew to stop the spread of coronavirus was imposed. It is just the tip of the iceberg when it comes to grievances with the government.
Earthquakes cause minor damage in Spanish region of Granada
What is the new London Greenground map?One graphic designer is encouraging more people to walk and cycle by creating a map of green spaces in the capital.
4 of the most luxurious campervans money can buy
Should the UK help save French-owned Eurostar from the brink of ruin?
Dutch police clash with rioters in third night of violenceAt least 70 people have been arrested amid reports of looting in Rotterdam, as demonstrators take to the streets against a national coronavirus curfew.
Documentary makers acquitted of illegally exploring MS Estonia wreck
Is Crete Europe's last wild frontier?
Pope Francis cancels three more appearances after sciatica flareup
Meet the cycling obsessed family who spend their lives on the roadSafe, accessible roads are "the biggest gift we can give our children."
Heavy rain helps bring Western Balkans' waste problem into viewSwollen winter waters have surged over landfill sites near the river banks, pulling rubbish downstream.
The bike-loving Finnish city that keeps pedalling even in the snowDespite the long, dark, and snow-filled winters, locals keep pedalling their way to and from work and school.
How to travel safely in Europe during COVID-19
Thousands of European deaths could be avoided if emissions are cut
Is this the most sought after job in the world?
What is the new US Vice President's environmental background?Kamala Harris makes history today as the first woman to ever be VP, but she has interesting climate credentials too.
America's 46th President: Joe Biden's long road to the White House
Guatemala troops and police break up caravan of weary migrantsSome migrants threw rocks while authorities pushed the caravan back down the road with their riot shields. Migrants with children were more gently prodded back the way they had come.
Istanbul skids and slides to a halt as snow blankets Turkish cityIt comes as extreme cold has hit large parts of Europe, with freezing temperatures cracking railroad tracks in Poland and smog spiking as coal was being burned to generate heat.
'Brexit carnage': UK fishing sector protests extra red tape outside EUBritish fishing communities were among the strongest supporters of Brexit. But now some are protesting against the extra red tape it has brought.
Heavy snowfall and extreme cold sweeps over EuropeTemperatures plummeted to -28°C in some places.
Turning off your camera in video calls could help cut carbon emissionsDid you know? Streaming videos adds to the carbon, water and land footprints of your internet usage.
At least two dead after cargo ship sinks off Turkey in Black SeaA Turkish official said emergency workers had saved at least six crew members and found the bodies of two others.
Paris Champs-Élysées to be turned into an 'extraordinary garden'The French capital is transforming its iconic promenade into a green oasis.
DC police arrest man with loaded gun and false inauguration credential
Drugs, addicts and dealers: an underworld adapting to a pandemicThe COVID-19 pandemic has turned logistics and supply-chains upside down for both legal and illicit trade. In this episode of Unreported Europe, we look at how drug addicts are getting their fix and how dealers are bypassing pandemic restrictions.
Has the illegal drug trade outsmarted a pandemic?Andrew Cunningham, an expert on illegal drug markets, Crime and Supply Reduction, gives Euronews his insight into how the illegal drug trade is being changed by the pandemic.
Four still in custody in Belgium as Interior Minister condemns riots
Russian revelations: Art and pizza in St. Petersburg
Ilham Kadri - Getting the right chemistry
Meet the youngest male to travel to every country in the world
Uganda votes in tense election as crackdown on opposition continues
Which destinations need tourism most to survive after COVID-19?
Estonian prime minister Juri Ratas resigns amid corruption allegations
US carries out its first execution of female inmate since 1953A Kansas woman was executed on Wednesday for strangling an expectant mother in Missouri, the first time in nearly seven decades that the US government has put to death a female inmate.
Austria suspects outbreak of new UK COVID-19 strain at ski resort
Has Malta changed since PM Joseph Muscat resigned a year ago?New prime minister Robert Abela has been in power in Malta for a year since his predecessor resigned under public pressure. Critics think not much on the island has changed.
Twinkle Twinkle Little Star walk: Four spots for star walks in the UK
Volkswagen hails breakthrough after tripling electric car salesVolkswagen announced that it tripled electric car sales in 2020 as Europe pushes new limits on vehicle emissions.
Manatee with ‘Trump’ carved on its back prompts criminal investigation
Army drafted in to clear roads, airports and train tracks in Madrid
Four Russian soldiers killed and 40 hurt in truck crash near Moscow
Parts of Japan see record snowfall as military brought in
In pictures: Spain under snow as weather alerts remain in place
Record snowfall across most of Spain brings transport to a standstill
Golf is a giant board game damaging the planet: Time for it to go"It’s time we, as a society, admit that golf was a bad idea and move on," argues Abbie Richards.
Giant sinkhole swallows cars and trees at hospital in NaplesThe sinkhole, which was 20 metres deep and opened up at dawn, could have been caused by recent heavy rainfall, according to firefighters.
Why you should never eat icicles in cities, warns a meteorologistWhat exactly is inside these icy spikes and why could they be dangerous for humans?
What does Brexit mean for those travelling to and from the UK?
How Trump's house of cards has tumbled in his final days as president
Green future: how will Europe power its low-carbon economy?
1 in 6 people are making environmental New Year’s resolutions in 2021A new survey reveals over half of Brits want to get better at recycling in 2021 and are putting the planet first.
Norway sets gold standard for electric car sales in 2020
Ukrainian police find new evidence in Pavel Sheremet murder
This cross-border cycle path links Spain to the Atlantic Pyrenees
Why are black people more likely to be exposed to toxic air pollution?Francisca Rockey considers the role of environmental racism in the death of 9-year-old Ella Adoo-Kissi-Debrah.
Brussels says new city-wide 30 km/h speed limit will increase safetyCity officials say the limit will be enforced by police and speed cameras nearly everywhere in the Belgian capital.
Ireland bypasses post-Brexit UK with more direct sea routes to Europe
Beyond coronavirus: The news stories that shaped Europe in 2020The coronavirus pandemic is not the only event to touch the lives of Europeans. Here are just some of the stories to make the headlines during the year of COVID-19.
Mobile homes arrive in Croatia to shelter residents after earthquake
Lewis Hamilton: Formula 1 driver receives a knighthood
'A farce and failure': Experts slam MPs' scrutiny of post-Brexit deal
Drivers stranded in Dover at Xmas suffered ordeal 'worse than prison'
New Yorkers highlight what they don't want to carry into 2021Their wishes were made as part of the annual Good Riddance Day.
At least seven dead as Croatia rocked by 6.4-magnitude earthquake
French fashion designer Pierre Cardin has died aged 98BREAKING: French fashion designer Pierre Cardin, style visionary and prêt-à-porter pioneer, has died aged 98
Nashville police release video footage of December 25 explosion
Nashville bombing suspect told neighbour: 'The world won't forget me'
EU 'ready to help' after earthquake damages buildings in Croatia
Auto industry evaluates its future outside the EU single market
21 great Greek travel ideas for 2021
Snow safari: The world's first electric sleds hit the ArcticTourists can now travel around Lapland in environmentally-friendly snowmobiles.
Madeira hit by floods and torrential rain on Christmas DayDozens of people were evacuated from their homes and at least one house was destroyed, local media reported.
Swamped with sprouts? Our guide to fighting Christmas leftover waste
Nashville hit with explosion believed to be 'intentional'
Northern Lights Photographer of the Year showcases stunning phenomenon
Christmas in times of coronavirus, from Bethlehem to RomeFrom Bethlehem to Rome and beyond, coronavirus restrictions dampened Christmas Eve celebrations on Thursday.
Travellers stranded in Dover for days waiting to board ferriesFamilies with young children were among those waiting in Dover to cross the channel.
Europe’s 7 best ski resorts for non-skiers
Stranded truck drivers scuffle with police at UK's Dover Port
Dubai trials shared mobility and greener transport solutions
New hacking scams - Here's how to avoid them
Our guide to planet-friendly Christmas cardsAn average of 1 billion Christmas cards are thrown away every year in the UK. Here's our guide to planet-friendly cards.
Drive-through COVID-19 vaccination centre opens in north west EnglandThe car park of Hyde Leisure Centre in Greater Manchester is being used as a drive-through coronavirus vaccination centre
Official: Large car bomb kills 9 in Afghan capitalOfficial: Large car bomb kills 9 in Afghan capital
German court upholds tree-felling ban at Tesla plant siteA German court ruled that Tesla has to stop clearing trees on some parts of the site outside Berlin where it is building the company's first electric car factory in Europe.
Was Macron's conduct careless before his COVID-19 diagnosis?
The core ores vital for a green future
Post-Brexit deal: How exactly do the EU-UK positions differ?
Tunisian activists protest surveillance a decade on from Arab Spring
Gunman behind foiled 2015 Thalys train attack gets life behind barsIt came just three months before the deadly November 13 attacks in Paris.
How Emirates Airline is weathering the storm of the pandemicEuronews speaks to Sir Tim Clark, the President of Emirates Airline, to discuss the company's COVID-19 response, the future of aviation and the industry's carbon footprint.
Police in Peru carry out drug-related arrest in Santa and elf disguise
Charlie Hebdo trial: Fugitive widow of attacker among 14 found guiltyThe terrorism trial of 14 people connected to the January 2015 Islamist attacks in Paris ended with one life sentence, two 30-year jail terms, and all convicted of involvement.
Europe expands night train network as rail becomes more popular
Toxic air levels in London drop by a ‘phenomenal’ 94%The report also showed an increase in walking and cycling in the British capital.
EU lawmakers should be careful what they wish for when it comes to Internet regulation ǀ ViewThe publication of the Digital Services Act by the EU will be a first step in providing a legal environment for tech companies. But Internet regulation must not create any unintended consequences for the way we communicate online.
Men arrested after accidentally showing police video of cannabis farm
John le Carré, author of 'Tinker Tailor Soldier Spy', dies aged 89John le Carre, who worked for Britain's intelligence service before turning his experience into fiction, has died aged 89.
UK, EU say post-Brexit trade talks will continue past Sunday deadline
Six injured after car ploughs through protesters in ManhattanPolice said the driver, a woman, was stopped near the area. She was taken into custody and questioned. It's not clear whether she will face charges.
Slipping, sliding and skating: Ice covers the Ukrainian capital Kyiv
Chess 'has not been kind to women,' says world champion Magnus Carlsen
Brussels wants to drive down carbon emissions from transport by 90%"It has a lot of interesting ideas, but you know the strategy is only at very the beginning," said one expert. "A lot of work needs to be done, a lot of work on the details."
British actress Barbara Windsor, star of Carry On films, dies aged 83
US carries out rare execution during presidential transitionThe Trump administration carried out its ninth federal execution of the year in what has been a first series of executions during a presidential transition.
Bertrand Piccard - From one to 1000 ways to make the world a cleaner place
Lebanon's caretaker PM charged with negligence over Beirut blast
Bulgaria citizens worried about rising air pollution amid COVID crisis
Russian F1 driver Nikita Mazepin condemned for Instagram video
France's next aircraft carrier to be nuclear-powered, Macron confirmsFrance's current flagship warship is to be retired in 2038. It will be replaced by a bigger, nuclear-powered model, Macron said on Tuesday.
Explosions hit three Polish supermarkets with same name in Netherlands
World’s first supersonic fighter pilot Chuck Yeager dies aged 97The first man to fly a plane faster than the speed of sound, Charles “Chuck” Yeagar, has died aged 97.
11 environmental books to buy for the Greta Thunberg in your lifePlus a few recommendations for the newly climate curious.
What does a no-deal Brexit mean? Key players' views in their own words
NYC bar owner runs over police officer after defying coronavirus rules
First samples of asteroid subsurface recovered in Australian outbackJapan's space agency has made history by successfully capturing and returning subsurface material from an asteroid for the first time.
Beer and bikes: A Brit's guide to Belgium
Deadly flooding hits Indonesia's Sumatra islandFlash floods hit the Indonesian city of Medan on Sumatra island.
The most striking images from this week's top stories
Monolith mystery continues as third structure appears in California
10 eco-friendly Christmas presents for friends and familyCelebrate Christmas and help the environment this year with our green gift guide.
Is a fake Christmas tree better for the environment than a real one?The answer is a lot more complicated than you might think.
Tributes paid to those killed when a car drove into shoppers in Trier
How to ‘future proof’ your petrol car with an electric conversion kitWith the 2030 ban on petrol vehicles fast approaching, one Irish company is leading the way towards greener roads.
Cash-for-licences scam found in Romania, says anti-corruption agencyIt is alleged the network issued driving licences and car registration documents in exchange for bribes.
How to travel sustainably on a budget
Trier: Five dead after car hits pedestrians in west German cityA nine-month-old baby is among the victims, police said, adding that the suspect did not appear to have a 'political or religious motive'.
Lewis Hamilton: Formula One champion tests positive for COVID-19
Meet the couple celebrating 10 years of their luxury hotel in Fez
This man is playing piano for Thailand’s hungry monkeysIn Lopburi, tourists have stopped coming creating a problem for the city's macaques.
Iran lays to rest nuclear scientist and vows to carry his forward work
Security law protest in Paris sees fires, water cannons and injuries
Huge mudslide engulfs Sardinia town of Bitti
F1 driver Grosjean 'OK' after car crashes and bursts into flames
Vaccine: Frankfurt Airport prepares for huge logistical challengeAs a string of COVID-19 vaccines near approval, Frankfurt Airport is preparing to transport millions of life-saving doses worldwide.
First fully carbon-neutral cargo flight set to take to the skies
The coolest French people I've ever met
45 arrested in Europe, Brazil with 'record haul' of cocaine seized
Carrefour withdraws Polish news adverts over LGBT rights
'Serious deficiencies': Sweden's nursing homes slammed over COVID care
Car with anti-globalisation message crashes into Merkel's office gates
Hybrid cars may pollute more than previously thought, claims NGOSome hybrid cars could be emitting eight times more carbon dioxide than previously thought, claims a report by European NGO Transport & Environment
Poland: Police using 'excessive violence' against peaceful protesters
Sweden receives request to re-investigate 1994 MS Estonia sinking
'A blip along the way': Harry Dunn's mum defiant after losing appealThe parents of Harry Dunn, a British teen who died after colliding with a car being driven on the wrong side of the road in the UK, have lost their High Court appeal.
Japan's handling of Carlos Ghosn was wrong, say rights expertsA panel of human rights experts working with the UN found that Ghosn’s arrest in Japan in late 2018 and early 2019 was "arbitrary" and called on Japan’s government to "take the necessary steps to remedy the situation of Mr. Ghosn without delay."
COVID-19: Thanksgiving could be make-or-break in US virus response
Turkey blocks EU inspection of cargo vessel travelling to Libya
How technology is revolutionising surgery in Varna
Frenchman fined for leaving home during lockdown to 'beat someone up'
'Green' mural created with 'pollution-eating' paint unveiled in Rome
UK signs trade deal with Canada to prepare for BrexitThe deal signed with Canada means the two countries will continue to trade under the same rules as when the UK was an EU member state while they negotiate a "bespoke" agreement.
At least 8 killed in mortar attack on residential districts in KabulAt least eight people are dead and over 30 wounded after shells were fired from two cars in a mortar attack in the Afghan capital.
Ice storms in Russia's far east prompts state of emergencyFreezing rain began pummelling Vladivostok overnight Thursday after a cyclone carrying hot air met an anticyclone carrying cold air.
How are political cartoonists in the MENA region drawing attention to social issues?The lot of political cartoonists in the Middle East & North Africa region is not an easy one.
Children in the Middle East & North Africa want funnier, relatable Arabic cartoonsFor many children in the Middle East and North Africa, who have grown up almost exclusively watching international animations, finding relatable cartoons can be a challenge.
Plans are underway to build a road beneath this prehistoric monument
London black cabs lie in 'taxi graveyard' amid COVID-19 lockdown
Azerbaijan takes over first district from Nagorno-Karabakh peace deal
Intensive Care Units in Switzerland 'at capacity' due to COVID-19The Swiss Society for Intensive Care Medicine has warned that units across the country are at capacity, which may compromise the healthcare available to those seriously ill with COVID-19
Guaranteed no-quarantine trips to the Caribbean have been launched
The UK’s Green Revolution plan is ‘nowhere near enough’, say criticsBoris Johnson's new climate pledge is worth £12 billion, but does it go far enough?
The Swiss are being urged to head to the slopes to save the ski season
UK unveils £12 billion plan to create a Green Industrial Revolution
Belgian businesses look for new opportunities amid pandemic
Making diamonds from the sky could help save the environment
Dresden museum heist: raids and arrests in major police operationThe large operation— which resulted in traffic restrictions across Berlin on Tuesday — comes a year after the November 25 theft of priceless 18th-century jewels from Dresden's Gruenes Geweolbe, or Green Vault Museum.
Coronavirus: French region to carry out mass testing before ChristmasThe French region of Auvergne Rhône-Alpes has ordered 2 million tests and will make 1,000 testing sites available.
'More people may die': Joe Biden urges Donald Trump to aid transition
Fearing voter fraud, Moldova war veterans keep an eye on Transnistria
COVID-19 in Europe: Austria locks down closing schools and shops
Coronavirus: Italy records new high of nearly 41,000 daily cases
Pictures of the week: striking images from this week's top stories
Yorkshire Ripper: 1970s UK serial killer Peter Sutcliffe diesSutcliffe was one of Britain's most notorious criminals and his murderous rampage during that period mesmerised the country amid a massive police manhunt.
Europeans plan to fly less and drive more post-COVID, says survey
Armenian PM defends Nagorno-Karabakh truce amid protests in Yerevan
Virgin’s floating pods make transport history with first passengers
Heavy rainfall in Crete causes flooded homes and sweeps cars into sea
Romanian health care workers demonstrate in a 'protest of exhaustion'
Vatican: Senior figures downplayed reports about ex-Cardinal McCarrick
Greenpeace activists race toy cars through London in petrol protestResearch shows a UK transition to electric vehicles by 2030 could boost the economy by £4.2 billion.
Heavy flooding on Greek island of Crete floods homes and damages roads
Biden defends Obamacare as US Supreme Court considers its merits
After a brief opening, skiing in Austria has snow plowed to a halt
Three men on trial for 2017 Barcelona and Cambrils terror attacksTwo men stand accused of belonging to the jihadist cell that orchestrated the attacks in the Barcelona area in August 2017, while the third defendant is accused of collaborating.
Hundreds of Armenian protesters decry new Nagorno-Karabakh deal
Adding a ‘carbon tax’ on meat could save the planet, say expertsCould increasing the price of meat help protect the planet and human health?
French police targeted by mortar fire in clashes outside high school
Already flooded south Florida takes pelting from Storm Eta
Coronavirus: ICU beds filling as global cases pass 50 millionHospitalisations are rising as European countries as an aggressive second wave of the coronavirus pandemic takes hold.
'This isn't over!': Donald Trump's supporters refuse to accept defeatAt protests in cities across the US, Trump supporters railed against the news that Joe Biden is the President-elect, chanting "This isn’t over! This isn’t over!" and "Fake news!"
'Biden can bring back kindness': Democrats toast winning White House"In 2016, we woke up crying," said Lola Faleit, a 26-year-old human resources manager in New York City. "Today we are celebrating."
Adieu overtourism! The next big little Greek island getaways
France's intensive care units near full as infections hit record high
Alejandro Agag: tearing up the motorsport rulebook
The 14 most Instagrammable ski resorts in Europe
Spanish court takes over new investigation of ex-king Juan Carlos IAnti-corruption prosecutors are allegedly probing the alleged use by the former king, ex-Queen Sofia and some family members of credit cards linked to foreign accounts not in their names.
Heiko Maas calls for reset in post-election US-German relationsThe German foreign minister called for a reversal of deteriorating relations with its strongest ally after four years of the Trump administration.
Biden's small drive-in rallies contrast with Trump's large crowdsBiden has stuck to socially distanced gatherings with small crowds segregated in their cars right up to the last moment -- in contrast to Trump's large rallies where few supporters bother with masks.
What is fracking and why could it swing the US election?
Joe Biden: Safe, steady and shaped by tragedy
US election: What are five big issues that Americans care about?
6 ways the US election could affect climate change
France: Macron says he understands Muslim shock over Prophet cartoons
What does extreme racing have to do with sustainability in Senegal?Extreme E is heading across the planet to support communities on the frontlines of the climate crisis.
Protesters burn Macron effigy amid tensions over right to caricatureThousands of protesters in Bangladesh vent their fury at French president Emmanuel Macron.
US election: how the outcome may affect trade conflict with the EUSince Donald Trump's accession to the presidency in 2017, relations with the EU have often been turbulent, not least over trade. Unreported Europe investigates how the outcome of the upcoming election may affect tariffs and taxes which have flown in either direction during the last four years.
¨Protest-hit Belarus closes all borders except its one with Russia
Japan plans to be carbon neutral by 2050Prime Minister Yoshihide Suga made the pledge in his first address to the Japanese parliament.
NYC transport guru aiming to solve Bucharest's congestion problem“This involvement is something emotional for me," Prof Michael Horodniceanu told Euronews. "Bucharest is my home town and I would like to use my expertise pro bono to better the city and make it more livable."
Nurses with COVID-19 asked to carry on working at Belgian hospital
Islamophobia or satire? Plantu on France's caricature controversySatirical cartoons have a long and colourful tradition in France that dates back to the Middle Ages, but in recent years they have inspired controversy – and horrific acts of violence such as the attacks against Charlie Hebdo in 2015. Nevertheless, cartoonist Jean Plantu says debate will win.
Captain of Portuguese ship arrested after collision with Greek warship
For late-season swims Cyprus has one of Europe's longest beach seasons
How to enjoy Switzerland's iconic ski resort, Verbier 'off season'
Drive-in Mass services becoming a Sunday favourite with VenezuelansWith more than 15 "drive-in masses" celebrated since August, 43-year-old priest Jonathan González said his church is a pioneer of the initiative in Venezuela, a mostly Catholic country.
Pope appoints Wilton Gregory as first African American cardinal
Lee Kun-Hee, driving force behind Samsung’s rise, dies at 78In just 30 years at the helm, Lee Kun-Hee turned Samsung into a global force and transformed South Korea into one of Asia's top economies.
Lithuania centre-right wins second round of legislative elections
Hull damage not to blame for 1994 MS Estonia disaster: new report
Czech PM will dismiss health minister unless he resigns
UK signs 'historic' trade agreement with JapanJapan is the UK's 11th largest export market with the value of trade between the two countries reaching £29 billion (€32 billion) in 2018.
Could former prime minister Saad Hariri reverse Lebanon's fortunes?
The Briefing: Fishing latest issue to get caught up in Brexit’s net
Brits in custody in Paris over attempted murder of police officerThe Paris prosecutor has opened an investigation for "attempted homicide of a person holding public authority".
Coronavirus: Belgian Foreign Minister Sophie Wilmès in intensive care
Barack Obama to hold first in-person event for candidate Joe Biden
Can Europe planting three billion trees help save the planet?NGOs fear that tree planting often leads to "greenwashing" by corporations and governments and distracts from the real effort to stop the burning of fossil fuels.
A short history of modern travel
Europe’s most spectacular rail journeys
When it rains, it pours: Floods hit Cork on last day before lockdown
Several countries threatening EU's 2050 carbon neutral goal, says MEP
Lithuanians with coronavirus vote at drive-in polling stations
Ex-boss of Basque separatist militant group ETA apologises for deathsJosu Urrutikoetxea led ETA during one of its bloodiest periods when its victims included children bombed to death while sleeping in a Zaragoza police compound
'I turned 17 in my prison cell': Meet climate activist Blue Sandford
Portugal - prodigious bike producer, late adopterPortugal is Europe's top bicycle producer, but lags behind many places in terms of domestic riders. Filipa Soares investigates why - and what's being done to address that.
EU Green Week: Europe’s plan to be first carbon-neutral continent
Could moths be the secret to understanding climate change?Moths might be overshadowed by their colourful butterfly cousins, but they're crucial to the pollination process.
Daphne Caruana Galizia: The fight for truth continues three years onInvestigative journalist Daphne Caruana Galizia was killed when a bomb planted in her car detonated. The fight to uncover the truth behind her murder and closure for her family continues to shake Malta to its foundations.
EU Summit: Decision on reducing carbon emissions pushed back
Try out a self-drive tour of Athens to see the city's best sites
German water utility pulls plug on Tesla over unpaid billsTesla is building its first European factory outside the German capital and aims to eventually build 500,000 electric vehicles there.
'We must avoid tariffs': UK car industry anxious over EU-UK trade deal
UK surprise after EU takes intensity out of post-Brexit trade talks
Thailand: Police disperse pro-democracy protesters outside PM's officePolice said they arrested more than 20 people for violating the state of emergency. They have not been officially charged.
Liverpool mayor says images of crowded streets 'shame our city'
Spain's far-right holds drive-in protest against state of emergencyScores of cars jammed traffic in Madrid on the Paseo de la Castellana, one of the capital's main roads.
Ecstatic fans celebrate Lakers' NBA championship winPlayers also faced the challenges that came with leaving home for three months to play in a "bubble" designed to keep its inhabitants safe from the coronavirus.
'Mission: Impossible 7': US star Tom Cruise spotted at filming in RomeThe Hollywood star and castmate Hayley Atwell were filming on the city's famous Fori Imperiali boulevard, which lies between Piazza Venezia and the Colosseum.
Fourteen people injured after truck collides with tram in Zurich
Lewis Hamilton wins his 91st F1 race to match Schumacher's record
Italian teenage computer whiz beatified by Catholic ChurchCarlo Acutis who died of leukemia in 2006 was described as the "patron saint of the internet".
COVID-19 photo exhibition in Rome is a moving tribute to Italians
Exotic, endangered & trafficked animals in the Middle East receive UAE careFor the past 15 years, the world has faced an unprecedented spike in illegal wildlife crime, according to the World Wildlife Fund.
Police clear out famous Berlin squat Liebig 34
Serbia has rolled out the red carpet to China - but at what cost?
French PM lambasts ‘cowardly individuals’ who shot police officersThe officers were on a surveillance mission when they were “taken by surprise” in an industrial area in Herblay, north of Paris
Here's what skiing holidays will look like this winter
Brexit trade talks: UK must 'put cards on table', says EU's Michel
EU climate law explained: Europe's plan to hit carbon net-zero
Emmanuelle Charpentier and Jennifer Doudna win Nobel Prize
McAfee software founder arrested by Spanish police over tax evasionAntivirus software founder John McAfee, wanted by the United States for tax evasion, has been arrested by Spanish police.
'Don't be afraid,' Trump urges after leaving hospital
The BARBARA Project - transforming food by-products into raw materialsCan food waste by-products be re-used to produce car parts and other industrial items, purposes unimaginable just a few years ago? The EU-supported BARBARA Project has made some big steps forward in that direction. Futuris visits Spain to find out more.
Extrusion - turning bioplastic and recycled food waste into materials for engineeringExtrusion - the machine process that helps turn bioplastic and recycled food waste into the materials for engineering, including 3D-printed car parts and other components
Floods death toll rises to 12 in France and Italy, dozens  missing
No limit on Total’s renewables strategyDiversity is the name of the game for Total. The French multinational is looking firmly to the future and further developing sources of renewable energy, particularly to feed the hunger for what the company describes as the “energy of the 21st century” - electricity.
Watch: Cars and houses buried by mud as France battered by storms
Czech Republic: Andrej Babis' party wins big in regional electionsThe elections were the first held in the Czech Republic during the coronavirus pandemic.
EV Charge: Electric mobility accessible wherever and whoever you are!EV Charge: Electric mobility accessible wherever and whoever you are!
Breakthrough paves way for launch of UAE-Israel Business Council
Will there be flying taxis in Paris for the 2024 Olympics?German air taxi startup Volocopter has just unveiled its latest, electric model.
The Truffle Hunters: new film laments Italy's disappearing way of life
This eco-friendly battery is powered by the smell of vanillaVanillin, a key ingredient in vanilla extract, takes the place of expensive and toxic rare metals.
Cutting carbon emissions and power costs in Southeast AsiaThe world's demand for power has increased by 85% in the last 20 years, with production responsible for about 25% of greenhouse gas emissions. In Southeast Asia alone, energy consumption is expected to double by 2040.
Could new electric 'air taxi' be the future of travel?Pegged as a transport method of the future, its designers say the Volocopter, a driverless, flying taxi, will revolutionise how we travel in cities.
Tributes after Argentine cartoonist Quino dies aged 88Argentine cartoonist Joaquín Salvador Lavado, the creator of the beloved comic strip Mafalda, has died at the age of 88, his editor announced Wednesday.
Adrenaline fuelled adventure sports on the rise in Dubai
COVID-19: French Open bubble not a real bubble, but Paris off-limitsUnlike at the US Open, where all fans were banned because of COVID-19 concerns, there are 1,000 spectators allowed per day at Roland Garros.
Camping nostalgia in Germany ahead of reunification anniversaryIt's 30 years since German reunification on 3 October.
Can a network of 7000 walking routes transform the way we travel?Hundreds of volunteers have been working to connect footpaths in the UK, but the project could soon be international.
Europe's worst shipping disaster 'caused by submarine collision'
Uber hails decision to allow it to carry on operating in LondonUber says the decision is recognition for its commitment to safety. But the association representing the UK capital’s traditional black cabs thinks it's a "disaster for London”. What do you think?
Brexit trade talks: How badly do Europe's exporters need a deal?Many major European exporters to Britain have sounded cries of alarm on the urgent need for a new post-Brexit free trade agreement.
Norway funds massive project to trap and store carbon dioxide at sea
Vatican cardinal denies wrongdoing after resigning over money scandal
World’s first electric boat race series takes to the seas in Monaco
Cartoon contest bids to highlight perils of political satire in EuropeThe international contest brought cartoonists from 44 countries together in a celebration of the freedom of expression.
World Press Cartoon awards face down censorshipResistance to censorship was a central theme of the World Press Cartoon awards in Portugal and the subsequent ongoing exhibition. The ceremony also managed to sucessfully navigate COVID-imposed restrictions.
Breonna Taylor: Two Louisville police officers shot amid protestsDemonstrators took to the streets of Louisville and other major US cities to protest after no charges were brought against police for Taylor's death.
Coronavirus: Austrian government sued over ski resort outbreak6,000 people from 45 countries have contacted the group with 80% of them testing positive for COVID-19 after returning from Ischgl.
EU wants to improve air traffic control and cut carbon footprintDelays, waiting to land or resorting to longer flight paths because of busy air corridors are just three examples of increased jet fuel consumption.
Forty years after the war, how are Iranian and Iraqi relations?Tehran now wields considerable political and economic influence in neighbouring Iraq with some Iraqis deploring that their country was "handed over to Iran".
UK: New COVID-19 restrictions announced as cases hit four-month high
English National Opera begins drive-in performances
People care more about climate change than saving money, says survey
The return of traditional camel racing to Egypt's Sinai desert
Vive le Tour! With young winner Pogačar, thrilling race defies virus
Student's invention to stop microplastic pollution wins Dyson AwardThe design has won the prestigious prize for removing 60 per cent of tyre wear particles on the roads.
It’s over 27,000km long, but what is The Great Trail of Canada?
The Netherlands must reduce carbon emissions by the end of the year, but can this be done?The Netherlands must reduce carbon emissions by the end of the year, but can this be done?
How are Tunisia’s plastics businesses faring during the COVID-19 crisis?Back in April, the International Monetary Fund approved a $745 million emergency loan to help Tunisia navigate the financial impact of the COVID-19 pandemic. The IMF also forecast the economy would contract by 4.3% this year.
Smog-eating paint purifies air on this giant mural in Poland
Biden blasts Trump's 'criminal' virus response at drive-in town hallUS Democratic candidate Joe Biden called President Donald Trump's downplaying of COVID-19 "close to criminal".
Hurricane Sally hits US south coast bringing damage and flooding
Airpnp: Polish activists cause a stink with toilet-sharing app stuntAn association in Poland has advertised a new app that purports to allow Warsaw residents to rent out their toilet for a fee — but there's a catch.
UK doing more COVID-19 tests than any other European country, says PMAs he faced a grilling from British lawmakers at PMQs, Prime Minister Boris Johnson said the UK was carrying out more COVID-19 tests than any other European country per 1,000 of the population.
Japan begins trial of ex-Nissan executive over Carlos Ghosn's payGreg Kelly denies involvement in a 'criminal conspiracy' to conceal financial compensation for Ghosn, who led Nissan Motor Co. for two decades.
Europe’s prettiest fairytale towns
Football: Neymar among 5 stoppage-time red cards as Marseille beat PSGThe Brazilian star was among five players sent off on Sunday as Marseille beat bitter rival Paris Saint-Germain for the first time in nine years.
US Open tennis: Dominic Thiem fightback earns first Grand Slam title
US wildfires death toll keeps climbing as smoke chokes West Coast
Yellow Vests stage comeback with protests across France
Is UK's new trade deal with Japan better than the EU's one?The UK government has pegged its free trade agreement with Japan as a win — but how does it compare with the EU accord it will lose in December?
Why are some Swiss people fearful about the rollout of 5G?
Europe's week: Brexit brinkmanship and reviving the EU's fortunesThis week Brexit talks took a new direction after the UK's admission it would break international law. We also take a look Europe's lopsided economic recovery.
UK secures free trade agreement with Japan in first deal post-Brexit
More than 500,000 flee as 'unprecedented' wildfires sweep Oregon
What is greenwashing and why is it a problem?Companies are using green credentials both to cover up scandals and to boost profit margins.
Kolesnikova 'tore up passport at border' to avoid exile in Ukraine
A new exhibition in Rome looks at Banksy's early career
Trump supporters stage motorcade near Portland, OregonHundreds of Donald Trump supporters staged a car parade on Monday near Portland, where anti-racism protests have been going on for months
Rolling Stones memorabilia store opens its doors in London
Brexit trade talks: What is the difference between deal and no deal?
Cities across Europe transform to bring down carbon emissions
Watch: COVID-19 patient enjoys sea air after months in intensive care
UAE’s Barakah Nuclear Energy Plant connects to national grid & accelerates power plansThe UAE is changing the way it powers its future growth.
French tourist fined €1,000 for taking sand from Sardinia beachWhite grains of sand from Sardinia's pristine beaches are considered precious and are a protected resource.
EU unveils action plan to secure access to critical raw materials
A 300-metre long 3D artwork adds beauty to a neighbourhood in Jakarta.A 300-metre long 3D artwork adds beauty and serenity to a neighbourhood in Jakarta. The artists from the independent 'Komunitas Perupa Jakarta' were keen to liven the mood during the ongoing coronavirus pandemic.
Trump visits Kenosha, calls violence 'domestic terrorism'
Charlie Hebdo republishes Muhammad cartoons on eve of terror trial
Citroen 2CV race goes ahead at Snetterton despite terrible conditions24hr Citroen 2CV race fails to match Le Mans for pace, but provides plenty of action
European cities race to clean the airMounting concerns about public health are pushing cities to scrub their air clean. But just how easy is breathing fresh air again?
How has thirty years of logging saved the rainforest in Guatemala?A community-led programme in the Maya Biosphere Reserve is revolutionising how we think about conservation.
Flavio Briatore: "I was one of the best"The ex‐ Formula 1 multi millionaire businessman talks to Euronews about his successful career and passion for Dubai.
For Belarus, a new chapter has begun - but how will it end?
'Best yet to come': Trump formally accepts presidential nomination
Typhoon that smashed South Korea now moves to its northern neighbourA typhoon that smashed South Korea, ripping off roofs and knocking out power to over 1,600 households, made landfall in North Korea early Thursday.
Why are wind turbines being painted black?A single blade on some turbines at a wind farm in Norway has received an interesting paint job.
Finnish town offers locals cake for cutting CO2 emissions
Mass arrests in Belarus as authorities question Nobel Laureate
17-year-old arrested after two shot dead at protest in Wisconsin, USA
Two people die during protests over police shooting of Jacob BlakeIt came during a third night of protests over the case of black man Jacob Blake, who was seen in a video being shot up to seven times at point-blank range by a white Kenosha police officer on Sunday.
Seven things to learn on the Arctic from documentarian Louie Palu
Why did this grandmother want to get arrested for climate activism?
YouTube star tricks Romanian media into running fake news story
National Guard called out after police shoot Black man in Wisconsin
British man quits job and sells home to build a zoo without barsMartin Blyth has gone from the classroom to founding his own innovative wildlife park with a focus on conservation.
New Japanese technologies fighting COVIDJapanese 3D technology is helping to fight COVID‐19. A doctor at Niigata Hospital has developed a ventilator you can make with a 3D printer and a scientist at Asukanet Co. has created a touchless 3D screen.
Gunman intended to blow up mosques, attack a third, NZ court told
WWII memorial defaced in massacred French village
Spanish police dismantle two networks smuggling migrants into FranceFifteen people have been arrested including three in the Spanish capital, Madrid, and one in Lleida, a city in the north-eastern province of Catalonia.
Massive blaze tears through California forcing thousands to fleeFirefighters have warned that the blaze is 'zero per cent contained'
Citroën sets a green example with launch of 100% electric carThe French manufacturer is leading the charge in the electric market, producing cars which generate zero emissions.
Berlin motorway accidents being investigated as Islamist attack
The invisible threat of noise pollution: How do we protect quiet?Noisy environments can be bad for both our mental and physical health.
The Native American Memorial Set to Be Bigger than Mount Rushmore
Family of dead Belarus protestor speaks out
Hariri verdict: One guilty, three acquitted of murder of former PMFormer Lebanese Prime Minister Rafik Hariri in Beirut was killed in a car bomb in Beirut more than 15 years ago.
The Climate App: Harnessing peer pressure to save the planetA new app founded by a NASA scholar has received backing from Olympians to major television personalities.
Russia summons Dutch diplomat after discovery of "tracking equipment"
Official: Spain's missing former king, Juan Carlos I, is in the UAE
Norwegian star skier Petter Northug admits cocaine and speeding chargeThe two-time Olympic champion is charged with possession and driving under the influence of drugs after saying he made a 'big mistake'
Somali forces end rebel siege of Mogadishu hotelSomalia's security forces on Sunday ended a nearly five-hour siege by Islamic extremists at a beachside hotel in Somalia's capital, said police and a government spokesman.
Belarus: Tens of thousands protest as Lukashenko rejects vote rerun
COVID-19: UK restrictions imposed as Europe battles rise in cases
Teenager recounts police beatings while detained amid Belarus protests
Britons rush to return home from France after UK quarantine move
People are seeking change in Belarus. Instead, they’re being mercilessly beaten and detained ǀ View
Extinction Rebellion take to the seas to protest cruise ship pollutionThe ship has been pumping out tonnes of pollution in a harbour in Cornwall, UK according to local residents.
Italy introduces mandatory tests for tourists returning from holidays
8 ways to make sustainable living work for you
Travel Guide for Holidaying in Spain during COVID-19
How do you make cities healthier, cleaner and cooler?Easy access to green space could add years to your life.
Row as Belgium beach towns ban day trippers amid heatwave
Scuba volunteers dive for trash in Stockholm’s waters
Men who care about the environment are more attractive, says study
Residents of Greek island face storm and flooding aftermath
Protester dies in Belarus as 'explosive detonates in his hand'
Seven killed in floods after torrential downpours on Greek island
Chinese 'robotaxis' take riders for a spinAs technology companies race to put self-driving vehicles on the road, some Chinese companies are launching taxi pilot projects in cities.
Brazil COVID-19 death toll passes 100,000
Nagasaki pleads for nuclear ban on 75th anniversary of US bombing
Mauritius sounds alarm as grounded bulk carrier leaks oil
Protesters in Poland try to block the arrest of LGBT activist
Vitosha Mountain: Bulgaria's  year-round nature escapeA postcard from Vitosha Mountain: Bulgaria's  year-round nature escape
US imposes sanctions on Hong Kong chief executive Carrie Lam
New York attorney general seeks to dissolve NRA
How has Belarus changed since 'Europe's last dictator' came to power?
Three French secret agents arrested for private murder plotThe three soldiers were stationed at a specialised parachute training centre under the authority of the country's external intelligence agency, the DGSE
A timeline of Beirut's explosions as told by people who survived them
Car-maker Audi apologises over 'insensitive' girl with banana ad
Seven dead in Greece as car carrying migrants crashes into roadworksThe migrants were believed to have recently entered the country when the crash happened, according to police.
Beirut blast: Death toll rises as three days of mourning startLebanon's Health Minister warned 'there are probably more (victims) under the rubble".
Could closing national parks actually be the best thing for wildlife?Thailand is planning to make closures a regular thing, but we ask if doing the same could help wildlife in Europe.
Dozens killed and thousands injured in Beirut port blast
Spain's ex-King Juan Carlos: From democratic hero to tainted exile
Ex-king Juan Carlos leaves Spain as brewing scandal divides country
Spain’s ex-king Juan Carlos quits country amid corruption probe
Solar panels and underfloor heating: Inside a very British eco homeAn air source heating system absorbs heat from the outside air to heat both the house and hot water.
Girl, 12, shot dead during drive-by gang violence in SwedenThe 12-year-old is not believed to have been a target of the shooting, and instead died after being caught in the crossfire at the fast-food restaurant.
Recycled roads will be made out of old tyres and building waste1 billion scrap tyres are produced globally every year. Now researchers are blending them together to make roads.
The rise of lockdown robots - and Nissan takes on Tesla
Afghanistan: ISIS attack on Jalalabad prison leaves many casualtiesOfficials said a suicide car bomb exploded and assailants attacked security forces and stormed the prison in Jalalabad, the capital of Nangarhar province.
Watch: Italy opens new Genoa bridge two years after fatal collapse
French family hospitalised after mistaking deadly flower for spinachThe family members thought that they were eating Tetragonia, or New Zealand spinach, but were instead ingesting a toxic plant known as Devil's weed.
The supersized attractions of Downtown DubaiThe delights Downtown Dubai, described by many as ‘The Centre of Now’, include  supersized attractions such as the world’s tallest building, Burj Khalifa; a 10-million litre aquarium and a huge virtual reality park.
COVID-19: France sees first rise in intensive care cases since April
NASA launches Mars rover to look for signs of ancient lifeA vehicle filled with cameras, microphones, drills, and lasers is part of an ambitious long-term project to bring rock samples from Mars to Earth for analysis in search of life.
COVID-19 mask debate: people from across the globe share their views
Iran fires missiles at mock-up of US aircraft carrier
Could eco-friendly credit cards cut down plastic waste in landfill?Around 6 billion payment cards are produced every year worldwide - that's a lot of plastic.
Brexit bureaucracy? 'Green card' required for UK drivers in Ireland
Germans more optimistic post-lockdown than French, Spanish & Italians
Europe aims to be first climate-neutral continent
Cara Delevingne on how to solve the food crisis with Vandana ShivaThe pair explore the connections between food, climate and health in a live interview to be streamed online.
One killed as violence erupts in weekend of protests across US
Christopher Columbus statues removed in Chicago after protests
Corruption in Ukraine: Is time running out to reform the country?
Which companies in Europe are cutting jobs because of COVID-19?
How might the next invention by battery anode creator Rachid Yazami change your life?Moroccan scientist, Professor Rachid Yazami’s passion for science started as a child, in his native Fez, with a fascination for geology.
Dirty tricks: Romanians order face masks but get toilet roll insteadPolice say the scam has seen 89 people fall victim to the fraudsters.
Three teens convicted for dragging PC Andrew Harper to his death
Earthquake scientists have found a surprise benefit of lockdown
Criminal suspect flees after taking police chief hostage in Ukraine
Middleman in Maltese journalist's murder admits stabbing himself
Power to the pedal as Brussels opens its first cycling 'motorway'It is part of an effort to increase sustainable travel, respect social distancing and ease pressure on crowded public transport in the wake of the COVID-19 lockdowns.
Alaska tsunami warning cancelled after magnitude-7.8 earthquakeThe earthquake struck just 60 miles south-southeast of Perryville, Alaska, initially triggering warnings for a possible tsunami.
Middleman in murder of Maltese journalist found stabbed pre-trial
An artist in Italy has carved this huge portrait of Joe BidenA land artist is helping to cultivate support for US presidential hopeful Joe Biden after carving a picture of him in an Italian field.
Ukrainians want 'fair' inquiry over murdered journalist Pavel SheremetThe award-winning journalist known for his criticism of the Kremlin and Kyiv leaders, died when a bomb planted in his car exploded during morning rush hour on July 20 in 2016.
UNalab Project pushes climate change readiness for European citiesEindhoven is one of a growing number of European cities using what are called Nature Based Solutions to try to improve urban climate and water resilience. The southern Dutch city is one of several at the forefront of the European UNaLab project.
Coronavirus: Performers create a drive-in circus in BrazilFollowing measures to curb the spread of the COVID-19, Brazilian circus artists decided to go back to work in a different way.
Kangaroo caught roaming streets of Florida by policeAfter receiving a call about a kangaroo running loose, Fort Lauderdale police officers managed to capture him and place him in a squad car.
Real Madrid clinch 34th La Liga title with win over VillarealMadrid clinched their 34th Spanish league title — and first since 2017 — after extending their perfect run following the pandemic break with a 2-1 win over Villarreal
'Putting nature first' could create nearly 400 million jobs by 2030Investing in nature could also benefit the economy.
Dozens swim to safety after floods trap cars in Palermo underpassMud and water swept away the vehicles and left them blocked in a highway underpass.
French health workers just got a pay rise. Will NHS staff get one too?
'I'm not a bad guy': Police video captures dying pleas of George Floyd
'Mandatory face nappies': Conservatives rage over masks in shops rule
Coronavirus: Man killed by police in US after dispute over face mask
Banksy painting, stolen from the Bataclan, to be returned to France
Overconsumption is driving the climate crisis, warn scientistsWe should be "challenging the notion that riches, and those who possess them, are inherently good”.
A tank for a plantpot? The French designer reimagining our vehiclesNicolas Abdelkader's series is called "The Urgency to Slow Down" and considers how vehicles could be greener.
Why is roadkill an environmental disaster?
Notre Dame cathedral: Spire to be rebuilt exactly as it was
ECJ 'makes it easier' to get compensation for Dieselgate scandal
Germany's EU Presidency rejects private sponsors to show 'integrity'
6 arrested after Dutch police find 'torture chamber' in sea containers
These revolutionary cities are forcing cars to take a back seatNow could be the perfect time for a sustainable transport revolution.
EU warning system detects record number of dangerous productsChildren's toys, including toy cars with batteries that presented a choking hazard, teddy bears that sent out electric shocks and slime toys, were most often identified by the Rapid Alert System.
North Macedonian Police find 211 migrants in truck at Greek border
Thousands flock to holiday destinations amid ongoing pandemic
Toronto art fans attend drive-in for socially distant Van Gogh exhibit
Latin America surpasses Europe's number of coronavirus cases
Is your fuel tank full of “forest-ravaging” palm oil?It's not the usual place you might expect to find it.
Lifting lockdowns, innovating against COVID and staycation trendsBusiness Line looks at why ending lockdown in the UK may not save some businesses; a Dubai-based initiative to help innovators get their COVID-fighting technologies to market; and, how an unexpected eco-staycation trend in Italy could provide a welcome boost to local business.
Holidays by train could cut carbon emissions in a post-lockdown world
Swearing, tailgating and horn-happy: new poll on European driversA majority of Greeks admitted in a poll that they're quite loose with their language when behind the wheel with 47% also revealing they deliberately tailgate drivers they find annoying.
Learning to drive an F1 car with Supercar Blondie
EU authorities penetrate phone network in huge organised crime sting
Jeff Bezos invests in green stadium - but critics aren't convinced
Watch: The advert banned in France for ‘creating a climate of anxiety’A Dutch electric bike company has had an ad banned for its negative portrayal of the car industry.
Russia voters agree to let Putin extend power until 2036
Merkel’s EU presidency is a critical test for EU solidarity ǀ View
Rented electric scooters to be allowed on roads in the UKThe UK is set to join a number of its European neighbours in allowing rental e-scooters on roads.
'Take care before you share': UN bids to tackle misinformationThe UN marked World Social Media Day by urging people to beware of fake news. Here's Euronews' guide to spot misinformation and stop its spread.
Afraid of the gym? Here are 3 socially-distanced outdoor alternativesFrom paddleboarding to plogging, here’s how to get fit while enjoying nature.
What are air bridges? And can they save your summer holiday?
How has Caracalla Dance Theatre influenced culture in the Middle East?Lebanese-born Abdel-Halim Caracalla created the Caracalla Dance Theatre during an era when pursuing a career in the expressive arts was not the norm.
Suspect shot in Glasgow incident namedHe died after he was shot by armed officers on Friday. Six other people are in hospital, including a police officer, who is in a "critical but stable condition".
France is  making ecocide illegal, but what does that mean?
22 police officers injured after lockdown clashes in London
Analysis: Can Europeans be trusted to follow the post-lockdown rules?The question comes after a makeshift rave in Brussels raised eyebrows in Belgium.
Italy care home negligence probe: 18 bodies ordered to be exhumed
Dream eco-home built with old tyres, tins cans and bottles"We'll find a use for most things to stop them going to landfill."
"This is insane" Supercar Blondie's F1 crash course
Virology and physics join forces to beat COVID-19Futuris explores how researchers from a variety of scientific disciplines are coming together to help better understand and beat COVID-19.
Rioters attack German police after drug check in StuttgartAttacks against shops and police started after officers carried out a drugs check in the city centre during the night between Saturday and Sunday, police said.
Paralympic champion and former F1 driver "stable" after crashThe condition of Alex Zanardi remains "serious". He underwent brain surgery following a crash with a lorry on Friday.
Lockdown forces Irish paralympic hopeful to tread-mill waterIn his suburban driveway in the west of Ireland, blind triathlete Leo Hynes clambers into a box of water, straps himself to a bungee cord and starts to swim - going nowhere, but going fast
Climate change is fuelling fiercer fires and forcing people to migrate
Major broadcaster to make all TV shows carbon neutral
Chaos in Dijon after armed gangs burn cars and face off with policeThe violence on Monday was believed to be a local reaction to three days of violence by Chechen gangs in Dijon.
Low-carbon liquids: Greenwash or a solution for climate neutrality?
Beijing braces for second wave after 49 new COVID-19 cases confirmed
In pictures: Black Lives Matter protests taking on the world
How is Formula E shaping the cars we drive in the real world?
More protests erupt in Atlanta, US, after man shot deadA Wendy's restaurant in Atlanta was set on fire by protesters after Rayshard Brooks was shot dead following an altercation with police officers.
Police in France protest chokehold ban and racism accusations
Wagner in a car park: Berlin opera adapts to COVID-19
Coronavirus: UK economy suffers record 20.4% contraction
Post-Brexit Guide: Where are we now – and how did we get here?
Coronavirus: "Throw everything you've got at it!" insists OECD chiefThe Global Conversation speaks to OECD Secretary-General José Ángel Gurría.
Deaths in police custody in Europe are back in the spotlight
Palliative care doctor shares a day in her life during COVID-19 era'You can lose the personal touch' says a British palliative care doctor as she took Euronews through her day treating end-of-life patients during a pandemic.
Elon Musk’s €47m underground tunnels will be used for electric carsCould the Boring Company's tunnelling projects be the solution to urban pollution?
COVID-19 economic impact to be 'unprecedented and long-lasting': OECD
Satellite data suggest COVID-19 started much earlier: Harvard research
"He hit me with an axe handle": Europe's lockdowns lead to a surge in domestic violence
ECB nearly doubles stimulus programme to tackle virus economic fallout
Analysis: Is Europe any better than the US when it comes to racism?
These are the top 5 eco-friendly cities for remote workers in EuropeDigital nomads are more and more common as the pandemic has taught many of us to work remotely. Where would you go?
Charities fear rise in modern slavery as UK lockdown eases
Germany announces €130 billion stimulus package as unemployment risesGerman Chancellor Angela Merkel said her left-right coalition has come up with a "bold response" that will boost consumer spending, invest in innovation and ease the financial strain on citizens.
German prosecutors think missing British girl Madeleine McCann is deadMcCann, then three, went missing on May 3, 2007, in and around the resort in Praia da Luz, on Portugal's Algarve coast.
Trianon trauma: Why is the 1920 treaty a national tragedy for Hungary?The fallout from the Treaty of Trianon - signed 100 years ago today - has echoes in current tensions between Hungary and its neighbours, where some two million ethnic Hungarians still live.
Who are Europe's poor?Real Economy takes a look at what it means to be poor in Europe today and how the problem is likely to get worse because of the coronavirus crisis
Helping Europe's poor cope with COVID
Europe’s leading conservation zoo is “fighting for its future”
Pedal power: Will cycling be the big winner after lockdown is lifted?Bike sales are booming and European cities are making more space for cycling. But, will it last?
COVID-19's 'deep impact' on the space industry
World's largest all-electric plane generates zero carbon emissions
Analysis: Amid the coronavirus crisis, have we reached 'peak car'?
COVID-19: Gibraltar seeks to protect macaques as it bans touching them
Coronavirus blues: the musicians struggling to make ends meet under lockdown
Nissan shuts Barcelona plant as COVID-19 drives car giant into the redSpain's government urged the Japanese car giant to reconsider, saying its decision would cost 3,000 jobs.
COVID-19 is sparking change in how high-risk patients are cared for with remote treatments ǀ View
Is planting trees the answer to offsetting our Netflix addiction?A new subscription service uses trees to offset users' carbon emissions caused by their streaming habits.
France promises €8bn to bail out struggling car industryFrench carmakers have seen a 90% drop off in sales since the beginning of the coronavirus pandemic.
Analysis: Does COVID-19 offer an opportunity for a green recovery?
Bad weather delays Space X launch to send two NASA astronauts to ISS
Coronavirus latest: UK launches test and trace system
In Italy and further afield, pollution and poverty have played a part in worsening COVID-19 ǀ View
Would you move to rural New Zealand to send your kids to Green School?
COVID-19 live: Macron unveils €8bn rescue package for car industry
'I don’t regret what I did': PM’s advisor defends 400km lockdown trip
EU to announce green strings for post-pandemic funding
App of kindness: tech that helps make the world a better placeSmart Regions takes a look at a mobile app that's connecting elderly, disabled and isolated people with carers in Poland.
German court rules against VW in 'Dieselgate' compensation scandal
German theatre company performs in car park due to COVID-19A theatre company in Germany has turned their car park into a drive-in where the audience can watch from the safety of their cars.
COVID-19: Spain will open borders to foreign tourists in JulySpain is opening up to foreign tourists in July and allowing its football league start back up behind closed doors in June. It's all part of a phasing out of restrictions.
Homeless under lockdown: the forgotten faces of France's coronavirus nightmare
Should wild animals still be used for entertainment at the circus?The coronavirus pandemic could offer an opportunity for circuses to transition away from shows involving animals.
UK to scrap healthcare surcharge for foreign NHS and care workers
Are care homes the dark side of Sweden’s coronavirus strategy?
US authorities arrest two men accused of helping Ghosn flee Japan
CO2 emissions have dropped under lockdown. Will it make a difference?
Health care workers turn their backs on Belgian prime ministerBelgium's Prime Minister Sophie Wilmes was given a frosty reception by some health care workers as she visited a hospital in the capital Brussels.
Will cars be banned in Paris after lockdown?The city is making changes to encourage people to embrace alternative forms of transport.
Coronavirus: UK unveils €680 million package for care homes
Revolutionary new robots run so fast they could overtake cheetahsRobotics developed in North Carolina have been designed to run like cheetahs, but what will they be used for?
Chain reaction: commuters and cities embrace cycling in COVID-19 era
Irish government under fire over COVID-19 deaths in care homes
More than 130 detained after protests against lockdown in Germany
Starved for culture, Czechs hold drive-in festival
Lean times during lockdown in cash-strapped Ukrainian zooHigh-quality beef has been partially replaced by other meats and broccoli swapped for cheaper cabbage.
Get to work on a bike - European governments work to put in place wider and more cycle paths
I love lockdown: meet the Europeans who don't want lockdown to endProblematic, even hideous for some, lockdown has been a blessing in disguise for others.
Russia celebrates Victory Day as lockdown leaves Moscow deserted
The deadly impact of COVID-19 on Europe's care homesIn this episode of Unreported Europe Euronews' Valérie Gauriat explores the devastating impact of the coronavirus on the continent's care home sector.
Amnesty slams alleged police brutality in French lockdown enforcement
Employees show us their weird and wonderful zoom set-ups at homeAs more employees than ever try remote working, we look at the environmental benefits and how to make it a success.
A robot takeover is possible - so what about the planet?With automation on the rise, we consider the complicated potential impact on the environment.
UK charities urge government to better protect  under pressure carersMore than 100 organisations, unions and think tanks have published an open letter urging politicians across the UK to act to protect carers from what it describes as a ‘growing poverty crisis’.
The EU’s COVID-19 budget and recovery plans must ensure a safe and healthy future for all ǀ View
Analysis: Will life really be so different once lockdown is over?Will many more of us work from home? Will cash be scrapped? Will the coronavirus be world-changing? Darren McCaffrey explores.
Couples marry at Duesseldorf's drive-in cinema
World's largest solar project to provide record-low energy tariffsA solar plant in Abu Dhabi is set to be the largest anywhere in the world, with the cheapest prices for solar power.
Global business must follow Germany’s private sector in linking COVID19 aid to climate action ǀ View
Musk and Bezos feud goes electric with Amazon's answer to TeslaWith 14.7 billion tonnes of goods delivered every year in Europe, could electric, driverless vans be the future?
Caregivers provide key lifeline to elderly and disabled amid pandemic
Analysis: The difficulty of lifting lockdown & keeping everyone happy
French care home staff lock down with residents to see out COVID-19
Ford's Europe HQ back at work as production restarts in first gearFord has restarted production at its main European car plants with strict standards on social distancing and safety precautions.
Italy eases coronavirus restrictions after two month lockdown
Drive-in confession in France during Covid-19 lockdown
Life after lockdown: Has coronavirus ruined the movie industry?
German party-goers dance the night away under lockdown thanks to 'car-disco'
Moscovites fleeing to dachas to escape pandemic get hostile reception
Life after lockdown: Will Europe's cities become greener?
Europe's secret truck war: drivers pay the price for east-west divide
In plain view: Drive-in cinema takes off at Vilnius airport
Analysis: Will lockdown spark long-term changes good for the planet?
UK is third worst-hit country in world after COVID-19 death toll soarsThe UK's COVID-19 death toll soars after government includes care home victims for the first time
Coping with Covid 19 : how cargo companies and big brands are adapting to the coronavirusBusiness Line Dubai explores how cargo companies are dealing with the Covid 19 health crisis.  The team also finds out how some big brands are adapting their advertising during the pandemic.
Boris Johnson and fiancée Carrie Symonds welcome 'healthy baby boy'
What are the key points of France's lockdown exit plan?
Europe’s cities fear post-lockdown congestion on transport networks
UK blown away as huge new wind farm will soon power 170,000 homes50 wind turbines will be erected in Scotland, expected to save 300,000 tonnes of carbon dioxide emissions annually.
Zoom meetings, Uber Eats and home workouts: ‘Lockdown’ life in Dubai
Denmark gives go-ahead for €7 billion underwater tunnel to GermanyThe Fehmarnbelt Link will allow trains and cars to cross the strait in just seven and ten minutes respectively. At the moment, a ferry takes about an hour to make the crossing.
Dutch students complete Atlantic crossing forced by virus
Find out why Poland's pig farmers are concerned about their livelihoods
Europe's week: Riots, rackets and reckoningsEuronews' Brussels bureau looks back at key developments across the continent this week.
Unrest, hunger and hardship in France's locked-down suburbs
Dream your way out of lockdown at this floating, solar-powered villaThis eco-conscious getaway is the stuff of dreams. But does it count as sustainable if you have to fly to get there?
Europe's hidden green spaces: from flowering roofs to bus stop gardensCities are planting unused space with foliage to tackle the challenges of urban living.
Unrest in Paris as residents accuse police of heavy-handed tactics
Wondering what you can do for Earth Day at home? Clean out your inbox
Coronavirus: climate change hasn't disappeared with the pandemic
How can the price of oil be negative? Euronews answersFor the first time ever, US crude oil prices dropped below $0 on Monday. Euronews breaks it all down for you.
Europe's 'Tiger Kings': New report highlights scale of captive tigers
'Move out!' Spanish healthcare workers threatened by neighboursHealthcare workers in Spain as in other European countries have been receiving threatening notes form their neighbours. They accuse caregivers of spreading the virus and are afraid their presence may mean they could catch COVID-19.
Germany eases lockdown restrictions as small shops reopen
Greek migrant camp is set alight as clashes shake Chios island
Orthodox Easter: churches largely empty amid coronavirus pandemic
Hans Zimmer composes a soundtrack for the BMW i4, will Tesla catch up?Why cities of the future might be filled with a quiet cacophony of electric vehicles.
Let's party! People attend German concert drive-in cinema style
Could over half of European COVID-19 deaths come from care homes?
COVID-19 is 'moment of truth' for EU, says Macron
Amid coronavirus lockdown, Ukrainians start to feel the pinch
Things to do in Al Quoz, Dubai’s art hub, home to Alserkal Avenue, artisan cafes and classic cars
Coronavirus lockdown gives us a taste of a fully electric future
Coronavirus: Lift lockdowns only slowly and carefully, warns WHO
Motor racing legend Stirling Moss dies aged 90Stirling Moss, who was considered the greatest Formula One driver never to win the world championship, has died.
Polish MPs set to debate abortion ban while lockdown prevents protest
Flying electric cars have landed and there will be races in late 2020With women among the pilots, this is set to be the Formula 1 for flying electric cars.
German church resurrects prayer with Easter service at drive-in cinemaThis church in Germany used a creative way of overcoming coronavirus lockdown restrictions.
French care homes hit hard as COVID-19 deaths mount
Indian inventor hopes COVID-19 car will put brakes on spread of virusThis is the wacky COVID-19 car created to encourage Indians to stay at home and prevent the spread of the virus.
What doctors and the WHO really said about Africa and vaccine testing
What happens to a coronavirus patient in intensive care?
Robots attend graduation in place of students at Japanese university
McDonald's employees protest for COVID-19 protection in Los AngelesEmployees of a Los Angeles McDonald's staged a vocal walkout to protest what they say is the lack of proper health and safety equipment in the fight against COVID-19
Cardinal Pell is free, cleared of child sex abuse in Melbourne
Coronavirus: UK PM Boris Johnson spends night in intensive care unit
Meet the people on the frontlines of the coronavirus pandemic
Volkswagen cheated emissions tests, UK court rulesVolkswagen used 'defeat devices' to cheat emissions tests, UK court rules
South Korea church holds drive-in service amid new outbreakA church in Seoul on Sunday offered a "drive-in" worship service for the faithful amid the new coronavirus outbreak.
Watch: Travelling around the empty streets of Rome on lockdownRome's majestic monuments and picturesque streets are deserted amid the ongoing coronavirus lockdown.
"No single country will be left behind in this crisis"
Meet the people losing their jobs amid the COVID-19 lockdowns
Covid-19: What are the consequences for small and medium enterprises?
Scientists discover green biofuel can be made out of tequilaForget shots on a Friday night, tequila now has a new function. Being used to power cars.
Tourist honeypots Venice and Lisbon deserted amid coronavirus lockdown
'I self-isolate in a car park': Homeless struggle amid French lockdown
'We look like clowns': Belarus carries on as rest of Europe locks down
With humans confined to their homes, animals are taking advantage
Cargo flights stay airborne as air traffic disappears during pandemic
UK announces ‘ambitious’ plan to become hub for green transportCould we be climbing aboard solar-powered trains in the near future?
Tails up? Is wildlife the big beneficiary of the COVID-19 lockdown?
You’ve heard of offsetting, but what in the world is carbon insetting?This new kid on the block could offer a more sustainable option than simply paying to plant trees.
A smash hit: Rage therapy helps fight stress in the UAEIn some countries of the Middle East and North Africa, a type of stress relief called destruction, or rage therapy, is rising in popularity.
'Can my husband see his mistress?': Police's oddest lockdown questions
New Zealand mosque gunman pleads guilty to murder, terrorism charges
Common electric car emissions myth busted by new studyIn countries where fossil fuels still generate the most electricity, is ditching petrol still a green option?
Grey smog lifts in India as coronavirus drives cars off the roadsWhat is the impact of the coronavirus outbreak on air quality in India?
French cartoonist behind Astérix, Albert Uderzo, dies aged 92Albert Uderzo, the cartoonist behind the famous French Astérix comic books, has died at the age of 92.
Coronavirus: Olympic flame begins its lonely journey in northern Japan
'Insensitive & arrogant': Crowds ignore social distancing pleas
Coronavirus: unique ways to maintain social distancing during outbreak
5.3 magnitude quake in Zagreb causes serious damageThe quake hit 7km north of the capital Zagreb at 6:23 a.m. (0523 GMT) on Sunday.
Coronavirus lockdown guide: Tips for survival, shopping, and self-care
Five stories you may have missed this week because of COVID-19The news may be saturated by COVID-19 and new areas of society it is affecting, but other news is still out there.
Spaniards and Italians in UK shocked by coronavirus response
Ex-Google engineer pleads guilty to stealing secret files
'Coronavirus dictatorship': Netanyahu accused of exploiting crisis
COVID-19: How and when do European countries plan to ease lockdowns?
Travel fears, 2020 motor offerings and running a private members club
Analysis: EU's strong measures against coronavirus threaten solidarityStrong EU measures against coronavirus are needed, but threaten European solidarity.
Are undetected cases helping rapid spread of coronavirus in Europe?
How to reduce carbon dioxide emissions from the cement industry
How can cement factories be carbon-neutral by 2050?
Tough conversations about end of life care can no longer be avoided as coronavirus spreads ǀ View
How carnivores are being given new life in EuropeA project funded by the European Cohesion Policy is promoting better preservation of and coexistence with the continent's dwindling carnivore populations.
'An amazing experience': carnivore enthusiast Dina Botta explains her fascination with wolvesThe naturalist behind the Carnivora Dinarica project which promotes the preservation of carnivores takes Euronews on a guided tour of their habitat.
This is the best country in Europe for driving an electric carFar ahead of the rest of the world, this small Nordic country is well on its way to making fossil fuels a thing of the past.
Pilot 'not licenced' for flight which killed footballer Emiliano Sala
COVID-19: Italy doctors 'forced to choose which patients get ICU care'
How fire turned a goat herder into a climate migrant in 'empty Spain'
The Brief: Trump flight ban, foreign policy report cardEurope is reeling from the news of the US president's flight ban. Ursula's planned trip to Greece is put on hold due to coronavirus and at 100 days in office, we look at Team Ursula's foreign policy performance.
Coronavirus takes toll on European supply chains and business
Green campaigners fume over Bucharest's pollution problemParticulate matter in Romania rose more than 1,000 per cent above the WHO threshold
Coronavirus: EU condemns Trump over travel ban from Schengen countries
Ex-MP's sadness for Lithuania 30 years on from Soviet independenceRimvydas Valatka told Euronews Lithuania is still short of being "a European state".
Are tiny electric cars the answer to big city pollution problems?So small you may not even need a license to drive them, these miniature cars are taking China by storm.
The tiles on this Danish square help tackle air pollutionThe tiles of Langelands Square, in the Frederiksberg district of the Danish capital, have a special coating that helps absorb nitrogen dioxide (NO2).
What can Luxembourg learn from Estonia about free public transport?Luxembourg recently became the first country to make public transport free. But pioneers Tallinn have been doing it for years.
European churches take measures to contain coronavirus outbreak
Green mayor calls for Paris to ban outdoor heaters amid CO2 concernsShould Paris pull the plug on heating outdoor terraces?
What’s life like inside the UK’s first zero carbon, eco village?The 250-strong village produces no carbon on a daily basis, with residents living entirely sustainably.
Sudan's PM survives assassination attempt, says state media
I tried out the UK’s first eco spa | Titanic Spa, Pennine HillsAll aboard the Titanic, for an eco-wellness journey of saltwater jacuzzis and solar panels.
Abandoning cafes for long supermarket lines, Milan enters coronavirus lockdownSupermarket staff were wearing masks and at the cashier people were told to stand one meter away from each other, Luca Galli. said
China: Quanzhou hotel collapse kills 10, more than 20 missingThe Xinjia Express Hotel was used to isolate people who had arrived from other parts of China hit by the coronavirus outbreak.
EU-Turkey migration deal is 'dead,' warns Greek PM Mitsotakis
Carbon 'saturation' of tropical forests risks worsening climate change
Migrants hurry to the Turkish-Greek border, only to find confusion and chaosTurkey said it would open the gateway to Greece, an apparent attempt to pressure the E.U. into taking more responsibility for Syrian refugees.
Tehran disinfects streets to protect against COVID-19 coronavirusIran is one of the worst-hit countries by COVID-19.
How climate change triggered a second exodus in Bosnia and HerzegovinaAna used to live in Bosnia and Herzegovina, on the banks of the River Sava, along the border with Croatia. One day, the most destructive floods of the century turned her into a climate migrant. #ClimateChange #EUClimateMigrants
Tornado survivors clung to furniture to avoid being carried awaySurvivors of a deadly tornado that hit Tennessee said they clung to each other and furniture to keep the winds from carrying them away.
UK catches up to Europe by making plant based biofuel standardThe bioethanol blend is set to become standard at petrol pumps in the UK.
U.S. carries out first airstrike on Taliban since Doha deal
Coronavirus fears dampen hustle and bustle of world's busiest citiesAn eerie quiet has settled upon normally teeming streets and squares as many residents opt to stay home.
Tennessee tornadoes kill at least 19 people and destroy 40 buildingsOne of the tornadoes caused severe damage across downtown Nashville, destroying the stained glass in a historic church and leaving hundreds of people homeless.
Deadly floods leave path of destruction in Rio de JaneiroAt least four people have died and hundreds affected by heavy rains that have been lashing Rio de Janeiro since Saturday, causing severe floods.
Trump’s fragile mental health must be handled with as much care as the coronavirus outbreak ǀ View
Contested convention talk heats up after Biden's big South Carolina win"Look, you don't change the rules in the middle of a game," Biden said.
Protesters clash with police at subway incident commemorationPolice emerged from the nearby Mong Kok police station to clear the roads but confrontations continued for hours.
Greta Thunberg responds to cartoon appearing to show her being assaulted
NBC News polls: Sanders has the edge in Texas, is tied with Biden in North CarolinaThe two states award a combined 338 delegates on Super Tuesday.
Joe Biden wins crucial victory in South Carolina democratic primaryJoe Biden won a crucial victory in South Carolina's Democratic primary, but will it be enough to keep his campaign alive heading into Super Tuesday?
South Carolina polls set to close as Biden hopes to rebound in 2020 primaryBernie Sanders has pulled into the lead nationally, but the former VP is hoping his strength with black voters could give him a boost.
South Carolina primary live updates: Democrats vote for 2020 candidatesThe 2020 Democratic primary heads down south.
Carles Puigdemont takes in rugby game ahead of Perpignan rallyIt is the nearest MEP Puigdemont has come to returning to Catalonia since fleeing in 2017.
With no insurance and deep medical debt, South Carolina voters swayed by health care"People are dying, and so many more are hurting. This has to be fixed," one woman said of the health care coverage gaps in South Carolina.
Luxembourg is first country in world to make public transport free
5 things to watch in the South Carolina primaryAnalysis: The former vice president faces a do-or-die moment, and rivals jockey for position heading into the "Super Tuesday" states that vote just three days later.
Critics slam Puigdemont rally near Catalonia amid COVID-19 outbreak
South Carolina Democratic primary: How does it work?The 2020 race is heading to the South.
The predictable disappointments of Netflix's unambitious 'Altered Carbon' ǀ View
Huge fire breaks out near Gare de Lyon train station in ParisGare de Lyon is one of six major stations in the French capital.
Huge plumes of smoke seen in Paris amid 'unacceptable abuses'The police said there was unacceptable violence occurring near the Gare de Lyon on the margins of a concert.
What South Carolinians 'confess' about the candidatesHere's what South Carolinians really think about the candidates and the 2020 presidential election.
Geneva Motor Show cancelled as Swiss bid to stop coronavirus spread
London's 'tart cards' reveal history of sex work, design and printingTitillation or a sociological document. Euronews takes a look at the phenomenon of 'tart cards', the way London's sex workers got themselves noticed.
Covid-19, A.I. and Big Data in healthcare and India's electric vehicles: Watch on Business Line
Biden's banking big on South Carolina, but his real challenge is Super TuesdayFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
'Mini-moon' may have been orbiting Earth for the last three years
Cars burned as Muslim-Hindu violence leaves 20 dead in New DelhiThe violence is over a controversial new citizenship law that excludes Muslims from fast track naturalisation.
Extreme weather exiles: how climate change is making European migrants
The loss of Caroline Flack has put the impact of online abuse on mental health in sharp focus ǀ View
Afghans remain hopeful days into U.S.-Taliban partial truce"We have been waiting for peace for 40 years, and now we are hopeful," one Afghan told NBC News.
Fact checking the South Carolina Democratic debateNBC News is fact checking the contenders on stage on Charleston.
Rivals pile on Bernie Sanders in South Carolina debateThe Democratic face off in Charleston comes just days ahead of the state's primary and Super Tuesday on March 3.
South Carolina Democratic debate live updates: Candidates face off in CharlestonThe 10th Democratic debate will be the last before the nominating contests in South Carolina on Saturday and 14 other states on Super Tuesday.
Britain’s “Hostile Environment” is destroying the lives of those who contribute to the UK ǀ View
An innovation fund could be the best way to cut maritime carbon emissions ǀ View
Humanity poised to set record for carbon dioxide in the atmosphere — again"We've done in a little more than 50 years what the Earth naturally took 10,000 years to do," one scientist said.
NBC News poll: Biden holds narrow lead over Sanders in South CarolinaBiden performs best among black and moderate voters, while Sanders holds lead with progressives and those under 45
Cardiology director says there's one heart measure Sanders could disclose but isn't
High-tech Start-Ups in Croatia: Rimac Automobili pushing electric car limitsRimac Automovili, just outside the capital Zagreb, has more than 600 employees, half of them are engineers, designing and building hyper sports cars as fast as a bullet train
Multiple injuries after car drives into Carnival parade in GermanyThe driver of the car was arrested, police said.
Investigation continues as injury toll rises in Germany car rammingPolice say the driver was arrested at the scene in Volkmarsen, after around 60 people including children, were injured at Carnival in the German town.
South Carolina is Biden's last chance to stop Bernie SandersFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
Samba schools show their talents at Rio Carnival parade
In pictures: Coronavirus and Greta among themes at Sitges CarnivalTwo people who attended the carnival in medical suits and masks said: 'We've got to laugh'.
Biden's South Carolina advantage shrinksThe latest NBC News/WSJ poll shows that Biden fares best among all Democrats with African-American voters, but the gap is not as wide as one might think.
Brazil revellers get muddy at 'Bloco da Lama' carnival party
Unstoppable? Bernie Sanders heads into South Carolina stronger than everAfter winning Nevada, the Vermont senator is riding a wave of votes, delegates and momentum into the next contest.
Carnival kicks off in Rio with traditional Carmelitas street partyThousands of revellers attended the Carmelitas street party during the first day of the Rio Carnival on Friday
Taiwan military disinfects plane carrying coronavirus ship evacuees
EU budget: Why you should care about the negotiationsThe Multiannual Financial Framework being discussed by European leaders might seem a very far political fight but it has very concrete impacts in the European Citizen's lives. Here are the basics.
In pictures: the best images from this week's news stories
How ski resorts are looking to the past to fight future climate change
British woman pleads guilty to St Paul's Cathedral terror plotSafiyya Shaikh, 36, was planning on planting a bomb at the famed London cathedral as she prepared her pledge of allegiance to the so-called Islamic State group.
In Nevada, caucusgoers are torn between who they believe can beat Trump and who they believe inDemocrats in the state want to oust Trump. They also want health care. The two impulses often collided at the ballot box.
Boat carrying 91 migrants goes missing in MediterraneanNews of the missing boat comes amid criticism of the European Union's lack of rescue missions in the Mediterranean Sea.
Nearly half of all flights from the UK are down to stag dos abroadSwapping Dubai for Edinburgh is the equivalent of giving up driving for 7 months, new analysis has found.
Designer fills London store with 90,000 plastic bottles
Far-right motive suspected after deadly attack in Germany"Everything will be done to investigate the circumstances of these terrible murders," German Chancellor Angela Merkel said.
Germany shootings: What we know about the Hanau attacks
Racism and far-right threat 'very high' in Germany, says minister
Full transcript: Ninth Democratic debate in Las VegasThe full dialogue and quotes of the 2020 presidential candidates, including Mike Bloomberg and Elizabeth Warren, from the ninth Democratic debate, held February 2020.
Artificial intelligence: How is the EU planning to catch US and China?Will the new strategy allow Europe to catch up with the US and China while protecting citizens from the risks of artificial intelligence? Euronews takes a look.
Winter storm leaves 50 people stranded at mountain pass in NorwayAbout 50 people are stuck at the Haukeli mountain pass (Haukeliseter Fjellstue) in southern Norway, due to a heavy winter storm.
Facing the flames: How Portugal is preparing for increased fire risk
Thousands watch 'flight of angel' at Venice carnivalA plumed angel dressed in an orange ball gown descended from the bell tower high above the Venice lagoon down into a crowd of thousands packed into St. Mark's Square for the annual carnival "flight of the angel" ceremony Sunday
Search abandoned for missing French citizens after plane crashA rescue mission has failed to find four French citizens who have been missing since their plane crashed near the Caribbean island of Dominica on Sunday, local authorities said on Tuesday.
Could seaweed be the fuel of the future?
Will seaweed fuel replace petrol by 2050?
Hungary's Orban lashes out at slow EU growth and 'sinister menaces'
Cute videos, but little evidence: Police say Amazon Ring isn't much of a crime fighterHundreds of police departments have signed agreements with Ring to gain access to footage filmed on home surveillance cameras
German economy stagnates as eurozone growth reaches 7-year low
Meet the material of the future that's 200 times stronger than steelNow there's a free manual on how to make the material of the future.
Hydrogen fuel cell vs electric cars: what you need to know
Greek tourism hit hard by cancellations amid coronavirus outbreakThe island of Santorini is a beloved destination for many Chinese tourists. But since the new COVID-19 coronavirus outbreak in China, scores are simply not showing up.
Brussels threatens Romania over alleged failure to protect forestsRomania has been threatened with legal action over illegal logging and allegedly not doing enough to protect some of Europe’s largest unspoilt forests.
Toxic air makes us miss 1.8 billion work days every yearThese missed workdays cost over €7 billion each day according to a report by Greenpeace.
Lebanon government wins confidence vote as protests rage
Brazil: Heavy rains cause floods and mudslide in Sao PauloLocal television stations showed cars covered by water, flooded streets, and kilometres of traffic jams in Sao Paulo in what some called a "chaotic" day.
Biden camp won't say whether he stands by welfare reform voteAnalysis: As the former vice president criticizes President Donald Trump's cuts to programs for the poor, he is likely to face questions about his own record.
'Coronavirus and high-tide fears' impacts Venice Carnival tourism
'Ignored and trivialized': Experts warned Australia government before catastrophic blazes"We could just see it coming," said Ken Thompson, co-founder of Emergency Leaders for Climate Action.
Storm Ciara: Eight dead as hurricane-force winds sweep across Europe
Thai soldier shot dead after killing at least 26 in gun rampage
Thai soldier kills at least 10 in shooting rampage, police saySoldier opens fire in northeastern city of Nakhon Ratchasima, Thailand.
Malta after the murder of journalist Daphne Caruana Galizia
The Brief: European cinema faces-off with US industry giantsAhead of the Oscars we take a look at the challenges facing European cinema.
Coronavirus: Hong Kong lifts quarantine on World Dream cruise ship
12 Israeli soldiers injured in car-ramming attack in JerusalemThe violence came as a 19-year-old Palestinian was killed in West Bank clashes, according to hospital officials.
ECB's Lagarde warns coronavirus is fueling economic uncertainty
Michigan Gov. Whitmer, in Democratic response to Trump's State of the Union, says GOP taking health care awayThe gains in the stock market that the president touts haven't helped average Americans, she says.
Nearly 30 years after my father’s  murder, investigative journalists are still under threat ǀ View
U.K. to ban sale of new gas, diesel and hybrid cars"We know as a country, as a society, as a planet, as a species, we must now act," said Prime Minister Boris Johnson.
Iowa entrance poll: Most Dems care more about beating Trump than issueAbout two-thirds of voters participating in the caucus said they would rather see the Democratic Party nominate a candidate who "can beat Donald Trump."
The votes are in and these celebs are doing the most for planet Earth
Would you take the train on holiday for extra days off?
Brexit road trip: On the last ferry from Europe to the UK
6 french ski resorts with outstanding green credentialsThese destinations allow you to enjoy the snow without worrying about your carbon footprint.
Memo shows CBP ordered agents to question Iranian-Americans at the borderDespite agency denials, a memo shows a Customs and Border Protection office ordered agents to question Iranian-Americans after Gen. Soleimani's death.
'Wuhan is a ghost city': Video reveals life in a coronavirus lockdown
700,000 Syrians flee intensifying bombing, U.S. envoy warnsU.S. special envoy for Syria James Jeffrey says the Syrian government and Russian warplanes had hit Idlib with 200 airstrikes "mainly against civilians."
French cardinal to offer his resignation again to Pope Francis
Italian bandits burn cars and scatter nails in failed highway robberyA gang made off with €5m in a similar heist on the same stretch of highway in 2014.
Britain angers US by giving Huawei limited role in 5G network
In 5-4 ruling, Supreme Court allows Trump plan to deny green cards to those who might need gov't aidDHS said last year that it would expand the definition of "public charge," to be applied to people whose immigration to the U.S. could be denied because of a concern that they would primarily depend on the government.
Brexit: What happens at midnight on Friday? Not a lot.
Euronews' Isabelle Kumar remembers her Jewish grandfather
Climate control: Stockholm named world’s smartest city as it aims for climate positive footprint
'I didn't even get to kiss my mum': Auschwitz prisoner tells his harrowing story of survival
Survivors return to Auschwitz 75 years after liberationThe event will recall the moment the Nazi camp was liberated by the Soviet army on Jan. 27, 1945.
GOP senator: Impeachment should encourage Trump to be more 'careful' next time"I think he'll put two and two together," Braun told NBC's "Meet the Press." "In this case, he was taken to the carpet."
What it’s really like to stay at Greece’s most coveted hotelI checked in at Blue Palace resort and spa on Crete's northeastern coast for a luxury mini-break.
Europe's hydrogen revolution: the promise of power without pollution
Two of 4 warrants letting FBI spy on ex-Trump aide Carter Page were not valid, says DOJThe DOJ now believes it didn't have probable cause to think Carter Page might be acting as an agent of a foreign power, which was required to surveil him.
Dems hammer home impeachment case in an argument that's (finally) uninterruptedFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
The 60 best sustainable clothing brands to wean you off fast fashion
All roads lead to Rome - and so does all traffic
Ten provinces on red alert as Storm Gloria sweeps across SpainPowerful Storm Gloria swept parts of Spain with high winds, heavy rain and snow forcing the closure of Alicante airport, disrupting 190 flights. The Ports of Gandia and Formentera were also closed.
Powerful hail storm and major dust storms in AustraliaBad weather brought chaos to parts of Australia, in the form of giant hailstones that pounded the capital Canberra. Wind gusts of 107 kilometers an hour were recorded in Dubbo as the dust storm descended over the town.
Father chokes coyote to death after attacks"The coyote attacked a young child, and the child's dad went into protection mode and suffocated the coyote until it succumbed," police said.
Mayor of 'Frozen' Austrian town taking new stance against overtourism
Powerful hail storm brings Australian capital, Canberra, to a haltBad weather brought chaos to parts of Australia, in the form of giant hailstones that pounded the capital Canberra. The storm brought down trees, caused flash flooding and inflicted minor injuries on residents.
Canadian Army sent to Newfoundland after massive snow driftResidents in St John's, Newfoundland, shovel snow after more than 28 inches (70 centimeters) of snow fell in 24 hours in the provincial capital.
Is flight-shaming helping resurrect Europe's overnight trains?
In New Hampshire, confusion around a new law could threaten young voter turnout"The problem is that all the rhetoric surrounding the bill has caused mass disinformation," one Dartmouth College student said.
Extinction Rebellion climate activists disrupt Brussels motor show
Blaze at Macron-visited Paris restaurant as pension protests continue
Malta's police chief resigns amid government reshuffleCutajar's resignation comes shortly after the resignation of Joseph Muscat as the island country's prime minister.
Nine things Davos 2020 is doing to be carbon-neutral
Carlos Ghosn's lawyers deny Nissan's allegations and claim collusion
Armed guards, secret location: Inside an illegal marijuana bazaar publicized on InstagramAn NBC News producer gained access to an underground operation in Los Angeles where dealers were selling bulk amounts of bootleg THC vape cartridges.
Meet the Turkish sports stars on the wrong side of President ErdoganTurkish football star Hakan Şükür is famously living in exile from Turkey, after getting on the wrong side of president Erdogan - and he's not the only sports star on the wanted list in Turkey.
EU parliament launches process to lift Puigdemont's MEP immunity
Tesla turns corner after testing times
Coffee, cork and car seats all the rage at Berlin Fashion Week
Think flying is the carbon-heavy part of your holiday? Think again.
Carlos Ghosn challenge prompts Yamaha warning on hiding in music cases
Fugitive businessman Carlos Ghosn demands €15 million from Renault
EU unveils €1 trillion plan to make the bloc carbon neutral by 2050
Ten years after deadly CIA operation in Afghanistan, a slain officer's family honors his memoryLaBonte's family told NBC News about his life and the lead-up to his death in a meeting gone wrong, an operation depicted in the movie "Zero Dark Thirty."
Are you more eco-friendly than your friends? This study says no.
Supreme Court will not consider Michelle Carter appeal for urging boyfriend to kill himselfShe spoke to her boyfriend and sent him texts saying that he should for forward with his plan to take his own life.
Can you 3D print a car?
Malta's new Prime Minister promises to stengthen rule of law
Inside Christie’s jewellery auction, where diamonds sell for millionsThis year, an 18.02-carat diamond ring sold for a whopping £881,250.
Lava gushes from Philippine volcano, forcing thousands to fleeThousands flee Taal volcano eruption in Philippines as ash shuts Manila airport
'I've paid highest political price for a dark episode,' says Malta PM
How Jerusalem's ancient past is the battleground for its futurePalestinians blame a major U.S.-backed Israeli archaeological dig for making this and other homes unlivable.
From infotainment to helicopter cabs, the auto industry is flying high at Consumer Electronics ShowBefore you even step inside, one "smart" car will set your seat to the right position, turn on your favorite tunes, and program the GPS for your next destination.
CES 2020: The big takeaways from tech's weirdest trade showWe may not have our own flying cars — yet — but at least we can talk to our faucets.
Ten breathtaking eco-resorts to visit in 2020
Malta PM Muscat set to give farewell speech after forced resignationJoseph Muscat has been accused of shieling close associates from the investigation into the murder of Daphne Caruana Galizia.
Migrant-carrying car crashes in Greece after high-speed police chase
How Europe could still sink Boris Johnson’s Brexit plans
Does money buy happiness? Billionaire giving $9M to Twitter followers to find outYusaku Maezawa will give 1 million yen to 1,000 followers, amounting to about $9,000 per person.
Uber’s new flying car is here, but is it all it’s cracked up to be?It might seem futuristic but it's true. The multinational taxi service is set to launch 100% electric flying cars.
U.S.-Iran crisis stops aid deliveries to thousands of vulnerable IraqisOxfam warns that if the heightened security concerns continue, some 100,000 vulnerable people could be affected.
Prince Harry and Meghan's shock announcement caps feud with British mediaAfter months of negative coverage and a lawsuit against a paper, the couple says they will no longer participate in the established system of media access.
Ghosn sheds light on Japan's legal systemThe former Nissan chairman escaped Japan last week. In his first appearance since, he attacked Japan's justice system.
Iran was always going to retaliate for Soleimani’s death. It doesn’t mean it wants a war ǀ View
8 home tech gadgets that will make your pad more eco-friendly
Polish scientists create a new kind of moldable artificial bone
Revellers fill Rio streets in unofficial street carnivalWhile the cities government official carnival only opens on January 12, carnival revellers attended more than 20 "blocos" or carnival street parties.
The unsinkable Joe Biden? Many months and many gaffes later, Biden is still aheadBiden has held steady atop a crowded field when other candidates who have climbed quickly have found it difficult to maintain momentum.
Suspected drunk driver hits young German tourists, killing sixThe driver of the car had a high blood alcohol content and was driving particularly fast, a police source told The Associated Press.
Fashion magazine swaps photos for illustrations in green gestureVogue Italia is highlighting the need for more sustainability in fashion with its first issue of 2020, in which photos are replaced with illustrations.
Tiny Italian enclave in Switzerland now belongs to Italy... againThe enclave has ping-ponged between Italy and Switzerland over the years. Now it's back with Rome.
Carlos Ghosn escape: Turkish suspects appear at Istanbul court
Strike on Soleimani was carried out without approval from Congress
Belgian judge suspends arrest warrant for Catalan leader Puigdemont
2020's new laws: Gender-neutral 'X' licenses, stronger ID, wear your hair the way you wantChanges in marijuana laws and steps to promote a healthier diet are in store in the new year as well.
Macron talks pension reform plan in New Year's messageMacron said that he hopes that there will be a compromise but that he would not give up.
Who is Carlos Ghosn? From "Mr Fix-it" to international fugitiveFrom "Mr Fix-it" to international fugitive. Who is Carlos #Ghosn?
How did fugitive Nissan ex-chairman Carlos Ghosn flee Japan for Lebanon?
E.U. nationals remain in limbo three years after Brexit vote"I really can't get over the fact that I am made to apply to stay in my own home," said one long-term E.U. migrant.
'I escaped alone': Carlos Ghosn clears family of helping Japan escape
Ousted Nissan exec Carlos Ghosn arrives in Lebanon as trial looms in JapanIt was not clear how Ghosn, who is of Lebanese origins, left Japan where he was under surveillance and is expected to face trial in April 2020.
Will 2020 be the year of 5G technology? Euronews explains
Will extreme wildfires become the norm of tomorrow?
Climate change became a burning issue in the 2010s, but also an opportunity ǀ View
New York bail changes set to take effect in January despite late swell of oppositionCash bail requirements and pretrial detention will be eliminated for those accused of most misdemeanors and nonviolent felonies.
How Netflix, Star Wars and Marvel redefined Hollywood ǀ View
Turkey offers treatment for 15 survivors of Somali blast
Rescue ship Alan Kurdi docks in Sicily carrying 32 migrants
Hanukkah stabbing suspect pleads not guilty to attempted murder
Plane crash in Louisiana kills five en route to college football gameA twin-engine plane headed to Atlanta crashed shortly after takeoff Saturday in Lafayette, Louisiana, killing five and injuring at least two, officials said.
Erdogan unveils prototypes of Turkey's first domestic car“We are witnessing a historic day, realizing a 60-year dream,” Erdogan said. “I know that our people is impatiently waiting for the day they can own this car.”
Rush hour carnage as Somali truck bomb kills at least 79
Car bomb in Somali capital kills at least 30The death toll will likely rise further, officials said, with more than 60 people wounded and still being taken to hospitals.
8 shot in music video 'ambush' near HoustonInvestigators believe a group of men were shooting the video in a parking lot when gunmen opened fire.
Tour helicopter carrying 7 people goes missing off Hawaii coast"We have trained crews responding and on scene searching for any signs of the helicopter and those aboard."
Tulsi Gabbard banks on billboards, yard signs to get her message outThe Hawaii lawmaker and 2020 Democrat's approach is one of her main ways of reaching voters.
216,000 civilians have fled amid Syria offensive — relief group
Taliban ambush peace convoy in Afghanistan, abducting activists
Watch again: Queen delivers Christmas message after 'bumpy' 2019Health scares, embarrassments and political turmoil - 'bumpy' may be an understatement but the Queen is also keen to celebrate the spirit of D-Day in her Christmas message to the Commonwealth.
They may be royal, but the queen's family had its own share of troubles this yearFrom an alleged rift between Princes William and Harry to a scandal around Prince Andrew, negative headlines have become the norm for the queen's family.
Putin opens huge Russia-Crimea rail bridge
This 23-year-old is on a mission to make theatre carbon neutralMeet Alice Boyd, the eco-minded theatre maker bringing sustainability to the stage.
Chinese card-maker says Tesco forced prison labour claims 'fabricated'A girl in London reportedly opened a card to find a message inside claiming to be from inmates at Shanghai's Qingpu Prison.
'We feel forgotten': Months after Dorian, Abaco Islands still completely devastatedAlmost four months after Hurricane Dorian flattened and flooded Great Abaco Island, the devastation looks much as it did when the storm swept through.
Rudy's helpers: A guide to the controversial figures assisting Giuliani in UkraineGiuliani's efforts to dig up dirt on the president's opponents is a central element of Trump's impeachment.
Everton appoint Italian Carlo Ancelotti as their new managerEverton said their new manager was one of the most successful in the world.
Russian ice divers put up New Year's tree in Lake BaikalThey are now pining for a new challenge.
Graffiti in Barcelona shows El Clasico rivals kissing
Andrew Bailey appointed first post-Brexit governor of Bank of EnglandThe incoming Bank of England chief will come in just as the UK is departing the European Union.
Sarah Sanders mocks Biden for stuttering. Biden responds, 'It's called empathy. Look it up.'Sanders eventually apologized for her initial tweet, which she deleted along with a follow-up post attempting to clarify the comment.
Russian security officer dead, five injured in shooting at Moscow headquarters of security agency
Watch again: Queen's speech as she opens UK parliament
Ping-pong-playing robots and other gadgets from Tokyo showcaseFrom aiding humans in space, to teaching us how to play better ping pong, it seems the robots of 2019 really just want to help
Impeachment caps a dark and dysfunctional decade in American politicsFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
Space agency warns of 'disaster' over levels of man-made junk
The biggest climate, environment and sustainability stories of 2019
MEPs call for Malta PM Joseph Muscat to quit immediatelyCentre-right MEPs have torn into Muscat over rule of law in Malta and his administration's alleged links to the murder of journalist Daphne Caruana Galizia.
Watch: Car collides with two trams in Czech Republic
Failure to digitise medical records could be putting lives at riskEuropean healthcare professionals say their field is lagging behind when it comes to digitising and sharing patients’ health information. This could be putting lives at risk.
India rocked by wave of violent protests against citizenship law
Trump-district Democrats carry impeachment to finish lineAnalysis: A wave of announcements from Democrats in swing districts has all but ensured that he will become the third president impeached by the House.
Qatar to adopt driverless public transport optionsThe country has done a deal with Volkswagen Group to provide autonomous vehicles for large and small groups.
Grave of top Nazi official dug up in Berlin
Parents guilty of murder and raised by radicals, Chesa Boudin is San Francisco's next DAHe's a prosecutor with a life story unlike any other —  and a very different view of the criminal justice system.
Scientists say mushrooms are the superfood of the future
Activists clash with police in India's citizenship law protestsOfficers using tear gas and batons tried to contain thousands of demonstrators who gathered near a university in Delhi.
Career high points for French and Dutch Judo Masters competitorsFantastic performances in today's Judo Masters including from France’s Fanny Estelle Posvite and the Netherlands' Michael Korrel, who produced career high points..
'Lost opportunity': Longest climate talks end with no deal on carbon
East Dunbartonshire or bust: Seeing the decline of Jo SwinsonReporting from the now former Lib Dem leader's constituency was a gamble, but sadly for Swinson, it became the story she never wanted.
A look under the hood of a homegrown Tunisian car brandTunisian motor company WallysCar was set up by two brothers who had no prior experience in mechanical engineering.
Republicans trash Hunter Biden at Judiciary Committee meeting on impeachmentThe vice president's son came under attack for his work for a Ukrainian company and past substance abuse issues.
Major fire breaks out on unlucky Russian aircraft carrierAdmiral Kuznetsov, launched in the mid-1980s, has spent most of its 30-year life tied up in port undergoing repairs
India deploys troops to curb violent protests over citizenship law
Online posts tied to suspected New Jersey deli shooter pushed anti-Semitic conspiracies
Seven things you didn't know you could rent on subscription
King Kong, ET and the Alien on display at Carlo Rambaldi exhibition
City of LED lights: How Carmel, Indiana, and other U.S. cities are trying to live up to the Paris AgreementA new report released Monday by America's Pledge, a climate-focused research initiative, found that the actions of cities, states and businesses can add up.
The Battle for Brussels roadsIt is one of the most congested capitals in Europe, and a new transport minister hopes to strike a balance between helping people get around and cutting carbon emissions.
Former top Mexican cop charged with protecting El Chapo's cartelGenaro Garcia Luna was charged with accepting millions of dollars in bribes in exchange for providing protection to the Sinaloa Cartel.
What are carbon markets and why are they the talk of COP25 in Madrid?
It’s not just carbon emissions posing a threat. Tech waste is a climate disaster in waiting ǀ View
Copenhagen green city goalsCopenhagen is known for its bikes and green outlook - but what are the latest ways the Nordic nation is trying to lead the way on cutting back on carbon? Greg Lory went to find out.
Gunman kills himself after shooting seven dead in Czech hospitalPolice said they found the perpetrator dead in his car from an apparent suicide.
UK's former most wanted handed 33 life sentences for sex attacks
Uber riders and drivers share fears about safety after company releases assault numbersUber noted in its report that assaults happen in a small fraction of rides, but a criminologist called the data "alarming."
Konvict to Konstruction: rap legend Akon building green city
Premature deaths expose Bosnia's toxic relationship with coal
Artist saves 11,000 bits of junk to make unusual Christmas 'tree'The inspiration came from a local petrol station.
Ireland takes action on carbon emissions - and nobody's happy
Pipe dream: The African cannabis empire that never wasA London firm planned a giant cannabis farm in the African jungle. Four years later there's little to show for it but dirt roads and a few angry investors.
What if you could eat meat without environmental guilt?Carbon Free Dining is extending carbon offsetting to restaurants - and helping communities in the process.
Ireland's farmers' fears over climate plansWith Irish farming also under pressure to reduce carbon emissions, farmers are concerned for how they can cut back while still making a profit.
Specter of U.S. interference looms over health care debate in U.K.The future of the National Health Service after Brexit has become a major talking point for Labour in its effort to oust the Conservatives in the election.
Transport-related emissions from tourism could increase by 25%
EU's 'carbon border tax' could hurt climate talks - China adviser
Former US President Jimmy Carter released from hospitalFormer US President Jimmy Carter was released from a Georgia hospital on Wednesday where he had been undergoing treatment for a urinary tract infection, his spokeswoman said.
WATCH | Tackling climate change in 60 seconds or less
France braces for more chaos as strike enters day two
EU mission in Malta calls for PM Muscat to quit immediately
Police find body of third person lost in Australian outbackClaire Hockridge, 46, had been missing for over two weeks after taking a drive into the outback with her partner and a family friend on Nov. 19.
'Shame on you': Eggs thrown at Malta PM as MEPs demand his resignation
SME Assembly - sustainability tops the agendaDelegates set out to understand if companies betting on 'green' growth are making the right choice, what kind of support and funding is available and what challenges do they face
Royal firestorm greets Trump as he lands in LondonPrince Andrew stepped away from his royal duties last month, but that has done little to quell the furor over his friendship with Jeffrey Epstein.
Two rescued after weeks lost in Australian outback"Two weeks' survival is insane. It doesn't happen," said a Northern Territories Police spokesperson.
Protesters call for Malta PM Muscat to immediately stand down
France says EU ready to respond strongly to latest US tariff threat
Supreme Court appears unlikely to hand victory to gun rights backers in 2nd Amendment case"You're asking us to take a case in which the other side has thrown in the towel and opine on a law that's not on the books anymore," Justice Sonia Sotomayor said.
Amazon removes Christmas ornaments depicting Auschwitz concentration campThe products were removed after the Auschwitz Memorial brought attention to them on social media.
Ukrainian politician's son killed in attack in KyivUnknown gunmen opened fire at the car of a local MP in the centre of Ukraine's capital on Sunday, killing his three-year-old son, a police source told Reuters.
Malta's PM announces plan to step down in 2020
Malta prime minister to resign amid protests over reporter's deathJoseph Muscat told the nation on Sunday he would resign in January after outcry over a 2017 car bombing that killed a journalist.
Shootouts in northern Mexican town kill 21, fueling debate on cartelsClashes between police and suspected cartel gunmen in a northern Mexican town killed 21 people this weekend, authorities said, adding fuel to a debate sparked by U.S. President Donald Trump, who has vowed to designate the gangs as terrorists.
Amazon removes 'inappropriate' Auschwitz Christmas productsThe Auschwitz Memorial asked Amazon on Sunday to take down items featured on the website that it said were inappropriate.
Maltese businessman charged over murder of Daphne Caruana Galizia
Search ends for survivors of Albanian quake as death toll reaches 51
Plea to help Albanian earthquake survivors as Durres search resumesMany houses have become unsafe to live in following the quake and its aftershocks.  Volunteers say the most urgent need is for clothing and blankets.
Suspect shot dead by police after attack near London Bridge
Malta PM Joseph Muscat 'plans to resign' over murdered journalist
Is this the end of the road for the €114m-a-year Strasbourg caravan?
Albanians sleeping in cars at roadside to stay safe after deadly quake
Thanksgiving Day winter storms cause travel woes across U.S.
Dieselgate: lawyers back legal action for Europeans
49-carat diamond among nearly 20 jewels stolen in German museum heistDresden's Grünes Gewölbe museum confirmed 17 items, including pieces belonging to Bavarian queens, were stolen in Monday's heist.
Improving their mooood? Cows get virtual reality to reduce anxietyThe virtual reality headsets simulate a "unique summer field" environment for the cows in a bid to reduce their anxiety and improve their mood. Do you think it will improve the taste of their milk?
Brexit: What European businesses should prepare for now ǀ View
Pensioner loses €20,000 after driving off with banknotes on car roofPolice in Germany are appealing for honesty if anyone finds the €20,000 in banknotes, which were lost after being left on a car roof before the driver pulled away.
Cara Delevingne and Kate Moss in star-studded campaign to save oceanIn the Project Zero video, celebrities talk about the important role the ocean plays in fighting climate change.
Top Maltese officials quit amid probe into reporter's murderThe resignations follow the arrest last week of Maltese hotelier and power company director Yorgen Fenech in relation with the case.
Labour claims NHS 'on the table' in Boris Johnson US trade talks
Shortcuts and a need for speed: Inside Amazon's delivery ramp up
Prosecutors ask life term for New York man who wanted to be martyr for HezbollahAli Kourani, a U.S. citizen, was "preoccupied with martyrdom" and spied for Hezbollah inside the U.S., as well as buying bomb-making materials in China.
Dutch police arrest two suspected of 'preparing terrorist attack'
Sub believed to be carrying tons of cocaine sinks off Spain's coastMedia reports said the vessel could be carrying three metric tons of the drug.
Albania earthquake: 'I heard the crush of collapsing roofs'
Surveillance video shows thieves using axe during Dresden jewerly heist"This is an attack on the cultural identity of all Saxons and the state of Saxony," an official said.
Cities of the future: Dreaming of a smart urban revolution
The world's largest E-ferry, connects two islands without emmiting CO2
Pro-democracy victory in Hong Kong puts pressure on leader Carrie LamHong Kong's leader Carrie Lam said on Mondat that she will "listen to the opinions of members of the public humbly and seriously reflect", after pro-democracy achieved a landslide victory in the District Council elections.
'Unimaginable' loss after heist at world-renowned museum in Dresden"Not only the state art collections were robbed, but we Saxons," tweeted the prime minister of Saxony.
Carbon dioxide in Earth's atmosphere reaches record high, researchers sayThe level of carbon dioxide in the atmosphere has risen sharply as a result of human activities.
Romania work to rescue more than 14,000 sheep aboard capsized shipRomanian authorities managed to rescue all 21-person crew and 32 sheep after the vessel capsized on Sunday - but there are still more than 14,000 sheep on board.
Two dead after massive floods hit southeast France
At least six dead as extreme weather batters EuropeStorms across France, Italy and Greece over the weekend have killed at least six people, and left one more missing.
Japanese imperial couple hold enthronement ceremonies in Ise sanctuaryEmperor Naruhito and Empress Masako have finished two days of ceremonies at the Ise shrine in central Japan.
Orphanage's tall order as it helps care for abandoned baby giraffeThe two-day-old giraffe was found in a comatose state and taken to a rhino orphanage, which is helping him recover.
Sacha Baron Cohen slams Facebook as 'greatest propaganda machine in history'"It only seems fair to say to Facebook, YouTube and Twitter, 'Your product is defective, you are obliged to fix it,'" the actor said in a speech to the Anti-Defamation League.
Was Bolivia's ousting of Morales a coup by the US for lithium?
Iranians grapple with internet outages amid protestsAt its lowest point, Iran's connectivity to the outside world fell to 4 percent of ordinary levels, according to the non-profit group Netblocks.
F1 team realises the challenge of changing tyres in weightlessnessRed Bull carried out a pit stop in the weightless conditions of Zero-G.
Read the full text from the fifth Democratic debateRead the full text from the fifth debate for the 2020 presidential election hosted by MSNBC and The Washington Post.
Hong Kong students' sewer escape thwartedProtesters trapped inside a Hong Kong university on Wednesday tried to flee through the sewers but firemen prevented further escape bids by blocking a manhole into the system.
Court acquits mountain guide charged with helping asylum seekersThe volunteer faced a three-month suspended sentence if the court had upheld his conviction for “facilitating irregular entry”
Dubai's bid to make bureaucratic backlogs a thing of the past
Malta arrests businessman in connection with journalist murderDaphne Caruana Galizia was killed in a powerful car bomb in October 2017.
Dubai’s best wildlife experiencesWhere to see the indigenous flora and fauna of the UAE
UK-bound ship returns to Netherlands after 25 migrants found onboard
Epstein suicide: Prison guards charged with not checking on inmates
EasyJet unveils plans to become world's first carbon-neutral airlineBut green groups question whether carbon offsetting delivers a big enough cut in emissions.
Every EasyJet flight is carbon neutral starting today
Daphne Caruana Galizia: Detained Maltese businessman released on bail
Iran supreme leader says protests were not carried out by the people
All American muscle car | The Mustang goes electricThe iconic US pony car's electric SUV version is set to go on sale by the end of 2020.
Two dead and several injured after bridge collapses in FranceA suspension bridge near Toulouse collapsed as a lorry, a car and possibly a van were crossing
Counting carbon: CO2 monitoring in a changing climate
'TV calamity': Rare Prince Andrew interview widely pannedThe decision to speak to the BBC was seen as a gamble for the royals who traditionally are tight-lipped and try to maintain a strong grip on their image.
Hundreds of protesters leave university under siege by police
Toilet tales and ducks for neighbours: Life on a canal boat in London
Iran's supreme leader warns 'thugs' amid violent gas price protestsAt least one person was killed and hundreds arrested, according to state media, after clashes in cities across the Islamic Republic saw security forces fire tear gas and live ammunition.
Prince Andrew addresses photo of him with Jeffrey Epstein accuser in BBC InterviewPrince Andrew addresses photo of him with Jeffrey Epstein accuser in BBC Interview
Protests erupt in Iran's major cities after petrol price riseRiot police and security forces clashed with demonstrators in  Tehran and dozens of cities across Iran on Saturday, Iranian news agencies and social media said.
'Yellow vests' back on the streets to mark movement's anniversaryRubbish bins and cars were set on fire as 'yellow vest' ('gilets jaunes') protesters hit the streets again to mark the movement's one-year anniversary.
His Royal Dryness: Prince ridiculed over 'car crash' interview
Violence as 'yellow vest' protesters mark one-year anniversary
Hong Kong's student protesters organize and catch up on class the same way: TelegramAs protesters turn to Telegram for more than just organizing, they're also at risk of efforts to infiltrate their groups given the movement's reliance on the app.
A year on, is the future bright for France's 'yellow vest' protesters?
Judge rules U.S.-born ISIS bride is not a citizenHoda Muthana will not be allowed to return to the U.S. after travelling to Syria to join the extremists in 2014.
Jet-propelled French adventurers fly through world's highest caveVincent Philippe Reffet and Frederic Yves Fugen leapt from a helicopter and sped towards Tianmen Cave, in central China's Hunan province.
Career White House budget official expected to testify in impeachment inquiryMark Sandy, a career official at the Office of Management and Budget, would be the first from the agency to appear before Congressional investigators.
Flying pigs? Not quite, meet Malawi’s flying RhinosThe story of 17 black rhinos in search of a new, protected home.
Suspect arrested in fatal shooting of Dutch footballer Kelvin MaynardDutch police have said one person has been arrested following an investigation into shooting of footballer Kelvin Maynard.
Germany narrowly avoids recession with suprise GDP figures
Islamic Jihad says cease-fire reached, but no Israel confirmation
Chicago mayor accuses Uber of 'paying off' black ministers to stop tax proposalChicago Mayor Lori Lightfoot said the company offered the ministers money to convince her to stop a plan to increase flat fees on ride shares in downtown.
Trump 'cared more about his own political interests than Ukraine'
Brexit prompts Tesla to choose Germany over UK for first Europe plant
World thirst for oil keeps growing, with SUVs a key culpritMounting demand for plastic is another factor. So is increasing plane travel. And the upcoming population boom in cities across Africa and Asia.
Billionaire's son is the latest target of China's social credit systemA failure to pay his debts within the given time will see Wang Sicong join the ranks of "discredited" people.
Australia court to give Cardinal Pell chance to have abuse convictions overturnedHe is the most senior Catholic to be found guilty of sexually abusing children and was sentenced to six years in prison.
The Brief: a time-travel trip in a Trabant - 'Ostalgia' in BrusselsIn Germany, Ostalgia is a nostalgic feeling for certain aspects of life in Communist East Germany. But beyond memories, some in Brussels think that there were a few aspects of socialism that should make a comeback.
Catalan separatists block major Spain-France road linkCatalonia has been rocked by mass protests since long prison sentences were handed down in mid-October to nine separatist leaders.
Winds fan ferocious fires in Australia's most populous stateA catastrophic fire warning was in place for Sydney, Australia's largest city, where a large blaze threatened homes on Tuesday.
US President Carter to undergo procedure to relieve pressure on brainThe 95-year-old former president has fallen at home at least twice in recent months.
Turkey stops truck carrying 82 migrants bound for EuropeTurkey seized 82 migrants in the coastal town of Ayvacik on Monday after finding them in back of a truck.
WATCH | Turning plastic waste into buildings
Longtime New York Republican Rep. Pete King announces retirementKing had served his Long Island congressional district since 1993.
Doctors, hospitals take up arms against Democrats' health care changesThe debate over various "Medicare for All" plans has gripped the presidential primary contest.
'Freedom for political prisoners,' Catalan separatists chant on election eve'Freedom for political prisoners,' Catalan separatists chant on election eve
Uber self-driving car in fatal crash did not recognize that pedestrians jaywalkThe automated car lacked "the capability to classify an object as a pedestrian unless that object was near a crosswalk," an NTSB report said.
Siemens CEO scoffs at 'pot smoker' after deputy praised Elon MuskSiemens CEO deplores admiration for 'pot smoker' after deputy praised Elon Musk
30 years after the fall of the Berlin Wall, how unified is Germany?
Brazilian ex-president released from prison
Torrential rain causes floods in northern EnglandTorrential rain in Yorkshire caused the banks of the River Don to burst onto roadways, affecting traffic in Sheffield and Rotherham.
Hong Kong protests turn deadly as student dies in fallChow Tsz-lok, 22, died Friday after having fallen from an upper to lower floor of a car park on Monday, officials confirmed.
As Spanish voters return to polls, here is what’s shaping the election
Man arrested in Mexico highway ambush is no longer a suspect, authorities sayPreliminary information indicates that a man arrested Tuesday is not linked to the killings of nine American citizens, including six children, a Mexican official said.
Health care helped Democrats win in Kentucky but 2020 candidates are changing the playbookFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
Dutch, UK police find 31 people in lorries in two separate operationsWiltshire police recovered 15 people in a lorry in Wednesday while their Dutch counterparts found 16 people in a truck about to board a ferry.
Meet the flying taxi that could revolutionise how we move around
This company wants to help cut meat's carbon footprintSolar Foods are growing protein that could be used to feed lab grown meat.
"Overtourism" ruining some of the world's most beautiful destinations
Watch: Former West German prisoner tells a Stasi love story
Schools in Indian capital reopen, air quality still unhealthyAuthorities in New Delhi banished cars with number plates ending in an odd number on Monday in a bid to reduce the pollution.
Mexico's new Ritz-Carlton champions local environmentThe super luxurious new hotel will offer an environmental stewardship programme to visitors.
'We're learning' says Lime CEO on electric scooter criticism
Five leading startups representing Europe at Web Summit 2019
Family recounts harrowing stories of young survivors of Mexican highway ambushThirteen-year-old Devin Langford had to walk for about 14 miles to La Mora, where the family lived, to look for help.
Britain’s post-Brexit survival depends on being more open to the world – by promoting tourism ǀ View
Biden brings up Charlottesville on the campaign trail, but has been a stranger to the cityResidents still reeling from a white supremacist rally wonder where the former VP has been.
'It’s better to sleep in a container and leave than to stay here and die'It’s hard to know how many migrants pass through Zeebrugge. Belgian authorities refuse to give any information at the moment, but the Ministry of interior previously indicated that close to 1800 migrants have been arrested in the port city this year alone.
UK terror threat level downgraded to 'substantial'"Despite the change in the threat level, terrorism remains one of the most direct and immediate risks to our National Security," Home Secretary Priti Patel said in a statement.
Columnist E. Jean Carroll, who accused Trump of sexual assault, sues him for defamationCarroll says Trump's denials and counter-attacks against her following her allegations "damaged her reputation" and "caused substantial professional harm."
EU argues against US metal tariffs at WTOIn a public hearing at the World Trade Organization, the European Union has launched a case against the United States over metal tariffs imposed in 2018. It is the first of a series of cases brought to the Geneva-based trade body by countries hit by those measures.
Romania opens road to nowhere as modernisation plan hits dead end
Gondoliers-turned-divers scour Venice's famed lagoon and canals for trash"They found all kind of things, including a lot of bicycles and even a bidet," a local official said. "I doubt tourists bring a bidet to Venice."
Toxic smog triggers restrictions on cars in India's capitalWorld Health Organization data released last year gave India the dubious distinction of having the world's 10 most polluted cities.
Thousands of Romanians protest against illegal logging, attacks on forest workers
Lewis Hamilton wins sixth F1 world title at US Grand Prix
Thousands rally in support of Lebanese president Michel AounThousands of protesters rallied outside Lebanon's presidential palace on November 3.
Tiny, privately owned satellites are changing how we view the EarthIn one year, Planet Labs built as many satellites as the rest of the world combined. Its images are used by governments, researchers, and even farmers.
Greta Thunberg seeks ride back across Atlantic for climate summit
'No friends but the mountains': U.S. Syria pullout follows years of Kurdish struggle"They really did feel that this time, they should not be abandoned and betrayed," political analyst Shivan Fazil said.
13 killed in Syria car bomb blastAbout 20 others were wounded when the bomb exploded in central Tal Abyad, authorities said.
Car bomb kills at least 13 in town on Syria's border with TurkeyA car bomb killed a dozen people and injured 30 on Saturday in Tel Abyad, a Syrian border town that Turkish-backed forces seized last month.
Palestinians march in Gaza after man killed in Israeli air strike
How close is the 'Dark Fate' predicted for humanity by the 'Terminator' saga?Scientists scoff at the idea that AI poses an existential threat, but military applications of the technology pose concern.
What is it like to be a Brexit Party MEP in the heart of the EU?
EU-Japan trade deal: the opportunities for small business
Biden pushes middle class message with new ads ahead of key Iowa testAhead of this weekend's gathering of state party activists, Biden shifts focus from Trump to his middle class message.
Watch: Last orders as UK parliament speaker John Bercow bows out
The art installation teaching us to care for our forestsLisa Wright and Tom Piper create mile long sculpture trail to commemorate 100 years of safeguarding the trees.
Honda is stepping on the gas to reach its electric intentions by 2022Japanese car designer set to achieve greener goal 3 years early.
Cooking accident triggers train fire in Pakistan, killing dozensThe fire broke out when a gas stove exploded as breakfast was being prepared on board. Safety regulations are often ignored in the overcrowded trains.
71 passengers killed as fire engulfs moving train in Pakistan"We could hear people crying and screaming for help," said Chaudhry Shujaat. "I thought we would die. The next car was on fire. We felt so helpless."
Fiat Chrysler, Peugeot join forces to create world's No.4 carmakerFiat Chrysler and Peugeot's French owner PSA are to join forces through a 50-50 share swap to create the world's fourth-largest carmaker.
ISIS spy who betrayed al-Baghdadi was motivated by revenge
Defying curfew and crackdown, thousands carry coffin of dead protesterThe crowd consisted mostly of young men, many draped in Iraqi flags. Surrounding streets brimmed with cars, taxis, motorcycles and tuk-tuks as more people made their way in.
Japan's technology leads the way in caring for the elderly
Masked gunmen open fire on protesters in Iraqi holy city, killing 18Demonstrations have gripped Iraq days, with protesters setting fire to government buildings and headquarters of Iran-backed militias.
Belgian court postpones arrest warrant case for former Catalan leader
Whistleblowers welcome: Mark Zaid represents Trump accuser, others with secrets to share
Court throws out North Carolina's congressional district mapsThe ruling said that the maps were "drawn in violation of our North Carolina Constitution."
Your gold jewellery could be going carbon neutralThe weight of CO2 produced when mining gold is pretty scary, but the industry is committed to making a change.
Huawei CEO: "US companies will suffer the most"
Al-Baghdadi once controlled much of Iraq and Syria. He died at the end of a dirt road.The jihadi died by his own hand at the end of a dirt track. A mound of rubble was all that was left of his final hideout.
Carnival held to mark Mexican Day of the DeadThousands of people took to the streets of Mexico City to dance beside giant skulls and skeletons, rolled out for the capital fourth edition of a Day of the Dead parade inspired by Hollywood, part of an ever-expanding menu of festivities for the holiday.
Paedophile Marc Dutroux and the murders that united a divided Belgium
Clashes break out in anti-government protests near Tripoli, LebanonLebanese anti-government protests continued on Saturday, but clashes broke out, injuring at least six people, near the city of Tripoli.
Rat race: Watch as lab rodents drive tiny cars to get Froot LoopsDrivers ed seemed to curb the rodents' stress levels — a finding scientists say could boost efforts to ease mental health problems in humans.
One million march in Santiago as Chile protest movement swells
Scientists have taught rats to drive - and they love it
Al Habtoor Chairman criticizes Trump and welcomes UAE income taxFrom humble beginnings, Emirati billionaire Khalaf Al Habtoor founded his eponymous company in 1970 and grew it to become one of the UAE’s most successful conglomerates.
Cara Delevingne: Eco-warrior on Instagram promotes fast fashionWhich fast fashion brand has the model recently partnered with to produce a new collection?
Apple co-founder Steve Wozniak says he does not expect fully autonomous cars 'in my lifetime'
Create rather than kill with artificial intelligence, says AI pioneer
Pedestrians narrowly escape Phoenix car crashPedestrians pushing a baby stroller miraculously survived a hit and run collision, according to surveillance video from a traffic junction.
My eco job: saving ugly fruit and veg from landfillTwo city workers decided to give up their high flying careers and do their bit to tackle food waste locally.
Ghosn's lawyers accuse Japan officials, Nissan execs of collusion
Senators advance bill requiring carbon monoxide detectors in public housing"A CO detector is not a luxury accessory for well-to-do homeowners. It should be a basic life-saving necessity," Sen. Bob Menendez, D-N.J., said.
Two dead after car falls from 4th level of Indianapolis car garagePhotos show the car landed on its top.
One man dies after torrential storms wreak havoc in CataloniaRescuers said they had found the body of a man along the coast around 40 kilometres north of Barcelona and that the search is ongoing for the four missing
Veganism could be key to reducing farming's carbon footprint
Could this scheme encourage UK drivers to buy electric vehicles?The UK government has announced new green number plates on electric vehicles that could offer drivers extra perks.
Lebanon protesters sing 'Baby Shark' to soothe a toddler stuck in traffic
Flash floods bring havoc and destruction to northern Italy
Jimmy Carter recovering from fractured pelvis after fallCarter is the oldest living former president and turned 95 earlier this month.
'Baby Shark' soothes toddler caught in Lebanon unrestThe episode was a short reprieve from days of unrest that has seen hundreds of thousands of people flooding the streets across the country.
Diplomat's wife to be interviewed by detectives over fatal car crashThe parents of Harry Dunn met President Trump at the White House last week, where they refused the president's offer to meet with Sacoolas.
Danielle Copperman | I visited an isolated eco-paradise in VietnamWellness influencer Danielle Copperman goes back to basics at a sustainable resort on the east coast of Vietnam.
New 'Star Wars: The Rise of Skywalker' trailer arrives on Carrie Fisher's birthdayThe latest film in the blockbuster Disney franchise, set for release in December, will feature the last footage Fisher filmed before her death in 2016.
Seized North Korean cargo ship awarded to United StatesA judge awarded Washington ownership of the Wise Honest after two families with claims against North Korea agreed to cooperate with the action.
UK reviews diplomatic immunity rules after crash involving U.S. womanUK reviews diplomatic immunity rules after crash involving U.S. woman
Half Moon Bay Pumpkin Festival draws thousands to coastal town in US
U.S. troops cross into Iraq from SyriaAbout 30 trailers and Hummers carrying heavier duty equipment crossed, with troops in cars coming through, a source told Reuters.
NBA Hong Kong tweet a lesson for many firmsIt's not just the NBA. There are hundreds of companies with ties and deep roots in China - everything from Amazon to Westinghouse.
Hong Kong protesters set up roadblocks, clash with police as unrest continuesPolice beefed up security measures for the unauthorized rally, the latest chapter in unrest that has disrupted life in the financial hub since early June.
EYE exchange: getting the vision you need to start and run your own business
Now you can stay at the real life Barbie Dreamhouse on AirbnbAirbnb is giving you the chance to stay at the life-sized Barbie Dreamhouse in Malibu - and it's all for a good cause.
China’s advertising industry waits to hear the winners of the Effie marketing awardsThe final countdown to the prestigious Greater China Effie Awards, for effectiveness in marketing, has begun.
Puigdemont walks free after handing himself to Brussels police
Commuters help save woman who fell onto train tracks in Argentina
Belgian car wins Darwin-to-Adelaide solar race
Catalan leader Quim Torra says there must be a new independence vote
Catalan pro-independence protesters clash with policeProtesters clash with police in third day of Catalan pro-independence demonstrations
Parents’ shock as suspect in son’s death sat next door at White HouseThe parents of Harry Dunn refused US President Donald Trump's offer to meet the woman involved in their son's fatal road crash after they found out she was sitting in an adjacent room.
Malta press freedom 'dire' two years on from journalist's murder
Pro-separatist protesters clash with police at Barcelona airport
The Global Energy Prize recognises the work of two leading scientistsMany of the greatest challenges facing the world today revolve around sustainable energy: how to create it, how to store it, and how to use it most efficiently.
World's biggest solar car race gets underway in Australia
Cardinal Newman declared a saint by Pope FrancisPope Francis on Sunday declared five people saints, including Cardinal John Henry Newman, a leading 19th century Anglican who converted to Catholicism and became one of the most influential Christian figures of modern times.
This House Dem opposes impeachment. He'll tell you he's on the 'right side of history.'Trump carried New Jersey's 2nd congressional district over Hillary Clinton in 2016.
Northern Ireland's violent past looms over last-ditch Brexit talksAnalysis: These are distressing times for those of us who were children when "the Troubles" began, who lived through its daily carnage.
US crash suspect does not have diplomatic immunity: UK Foreign OfficeThe Foreign Office said that, having gone home, Anne Sacoolas no longer has immunity.
Typhoon Hagibis batters Japan with high winds and heavy rainHagibis is wreaking havoc on mainland Japan and is expected to bring with it the heaviest rain and winds in sixty years. More than a million people have been advised to evacuate.
Tornado hits in Japan as country braces itself for typhoonA tornado ripped through Chiba Prefecture — south-east of the capital Tokyo — on Saturday, as Japan continued to brace itself for the arrival of a powerful typhoon that is forecast to be the worst in six decades.
Journalist's killing fuels ire of Haiti protesters
U.K. shopping center stabbing spree injures at least 5; suspect arrestedA man in his 40s was arrested on suspicion of serious assault.
Man arrested on suspicion of terrorism after stabbings in Manchester
What's Copenhagen's magic formula to reduce CO2 levels?The City of Copenhagen has set the very ambitious goal of becoming the world’s first carbon neutral capital by 2025.
Antibiotics are losing their power against deadly infections. Can we fix the problem?
Do lithium-ion batteries really deserve a Nobel Prize?The invention of the lithium-ion batteries -awarded with the 2019 Chemistry Nobel- has undoubtfully changed our societies, but it is not without a high environmental cost.
Thousands flee north-east Syria after Turkish offensive"People are fleeing when they can in cars, if not in the back of trucks, if not on foot, with what they can carry, old people, families, the sick."
'We must protect Jewish life' says German president after attack
Turkey says 180 targets hit as troops continue advance into Syria
Trump: We're going to 'see if we can do something' about fatal crash involving diplomat wifeThe president said the woman was driving on the wrong side of the road at the time of the crash.
Why the EU growing its own soybeans could prevent fires in Amazon
Amateur footage emerges of gunman opening fire in Halle, Germany
Hundreds caught riding electric scooters drunk during Oktoberfest
Nobel goes to makers of lithium-ion batteries that reduce fossil-fuel need"Through their work, this year's Chemistry Laureates have laid the foundation of a wireless, fossil fuel-free society," the Nobel committee said.
Scientists win Nobel Prize in Chemistry for lithium-ion batteries
Syrian man arrested after truck rams into traffic in Limburg, GermanyEight people were injured after a stolen truck was driven into vehicles at an intersection.
Blustering gustnado in Thailand picks up roofs and signsResidents captured the startling moments when a gustnado - a swirling wind caused by storm clouds - was seen in Samutprakan province
30 years on Belgian Comic Strip museum proves cartoons are timeless
Divers carve pumpkins in depths of Florida Keys
Raab to call Pompeo over fatal car crash involving US diplomat's wife
Extinction Rebellion activists glue hands to ground  in central LondonActivists blocked roads and bridges all over London's government district of Westminster, calling on politicians to take urgent action to curb carbon emissions.
Extinction Rebellion protestors removed by police in WellingtonPolice have arrested 30 climate change protesters after a day of civil disobedience in Wellington, New Zealand.
U.K. pushes for return of U.S. diplomat's wife after deadly crash
Iraq blames 'malicious' hands as toll from unrest tops 100
Trump allies respond to second whistleblower: 'Why should I care?'Republicans also said Trump was not serious when he suggested that China look into former Vice President Joe Biden and his son Hunter.
Pope Francis adds 13 like-minded cardinals to Catholic hierarchy
North Korea and US resume nuclear talks in bid to end stalemateAn isolated conference centre on the outskirts of Stockholm was the setting on Saturday for the US and North Korea to resume nuclear talks.
France's vineyards grapple with grape thieves at harvest timeIn the heart of Burgundy's most prestigious vineyards, security forces patrol day and night during harvest time to deter grape thieves.
Ten people dead after minibus collides with truck in RomaniaTen people died and seven others were injured in a road accident in Romania on Saturday, AFP reported quoting Romanian police.
Denmark calls for EU ban on all diesel and petrol cars by 2040
Prince Harry set to sue British tabloids over alleged voicemail hackingThe claims against The Sun and the Daily Mirror follow Harry's announcing earlier this week a lawsuit against the parent company of the Daily Mail.
Inside Chinese camps thought to be detaining a million Muslims"Our center is to prevent terrorism thoughts from happening," the director of one of the centers tells NBC News.
A RoboCop, a park and a fight: How expectations about robots are clashing with realityWhen Cogo Guebara pressed a button on a robot to call the police, she was instead instructed to "step out of the way."
Inside Dover: Europe's busiest ferry port prepares for Brexit
'They murdered our zebra': Trainers distraught over escaped animal
The Brief: Commission hearings - score cardCould do better: two commission candidates failed to impress MEPs - the Home Affairs nominee and the Pole tipped to lead Agriculture policy, They will face further questions. And we profile the Belgian candidate for the justice portfolio - whose political pedigree puts him in good stead.
Inside the startup that is building AI-powered military technology
Rouen fire: Expert fears carcinogenic molecules created in blaze
Meghan Markle takes legal action against British tabloid
Cardiff must pay Nantes €6 million for Sala transfer, says FIFACardiff City must pay Nantes €6 million for the transfer of Emiliano Sala who died in a plane crash on his way to the Welsh club, FIFA said on Monday.
Women die needlessly from heart attacks because of gender gap in care
El Gouna Film Festival: Looks from the red carpet
Using the EU’s own trade rules against it: the scourge of ‘VAT Carousel’ fraud | View
Trial opposing VW to 400,000 'Dieselgate' plaintiffs opens in Germany
Elon Musk responds in Russian to singing entrepreneursElon Musk has demonstrated his language skills, responding to an elaborately sung invitation to visit business leaders in the Russian city of Krasnodar.
Boyfriend of Atlanta woman who didn't realize she'd been shot in the head gets 25 years in prisonNicole Gordon went to the hospital for severe headaches and memory loss. Doctors found a bullet in her skull.
Watch: Motorbike ride sharing gets Dhaka traffic moving
German car lovers mock Greta's climate movement with new hashtag
I went for a seaweed massage at 5-star British hotel, Coworth Park
Prince Harry follows in footsteps of Princess Diana to clear landmine
World leaders at the UN and student protests are not enough to confront the climate crisis ǀ View
New wave of global climate protests: Are Friday strikes here to stay?A new wave of worldwide climate change protests inspired by Greta Thunberg's 'Fridays for Future' movement has got underway,
Swarm of bees creates a buzz in an Adelaide car parkLuckily an apiarist was on hand to deal with the problem.
Russian trawler catches fire in Norwegian port
Calais carries out drills to prepare for Brexit disruption
Placido Domingo dropped by US opera house amid sex misconduct claims
Jordan goes all Wacky Races as it hosts homemade cars contestJordanian racers riding self-designed cars that look like a falafel sandwich or a giant mosquito showed off their skills in the country's second soapbox race
Hit by the collapse of Thomas Cook? Here's what to do
Malta Migration Meeting: 'Solidarity a la carte is not workable'
Thunberg and youth activists file complaint over climate crisis
Emmys 2019: Game of Thrones win big on purple carpetBefore saying goodbye to Westeros, the cast of 'Game of Thrones' posed on the purple carpet of Sunday's (22 SEPT. 2019) Emmy Awards
How well are EU countries doing at meeting their UN climate goals?
Trump, Biden and Warren all face different obstacles for 2020First Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
Climate summit: 'Adults must start acting likes adults'Activists took advantage of Car-free Sunday to appeal to the incoming Commission to boost their green goals.
What is a circular economy and how does it work?
Global free flight festival: colorful carnival in the French AlpsAround 130 pilots from France and beyond flew paragliders during the 'Icarnaval' carnival, a contest awarding pilots with the best costume prize
I was enchanted by the car-free Greek island of SpetsesNavigable by electric bike, this historic island is full of charm, from its picturesque Old Harbour to hidden beaches where pines reach the water.
Two dead in South Carolina shooting
'Lack of ambition': Green groups slam Germany's new climate package
'Conflicts will poison': Family slams inquiry into journalist's murderThe sons of murdered journalist Daphne Caruana Galizia have questioned the independence of a newly announced public inquiry into their mother’s death.
On two wheels between the two seats of the EU Parliament | Part twoIn this video we take a look back at the bicycle journey of our correspondent between Brussels and Strasbourg.
On two wheels between the two seats of the EU Parliament | Part oneIn this video, our correspondent cycles between the two seats of the EU parliament, Brussels and Strasbourg
Langoustine carpaccio marries perfectly with Japanese sakeSake specialists are trying their best to introduce the unique characteristics of this complex fermented drink to the greatest number of people outside Japan
Watch back: Jeremy Corbyn speaks on climate crisisLabour leader says the government will 'hear demands' of youth activists.
Watch: Norway's last miners fight for survival against climate policy
Climate change: Poll finds a majority think it's an emergency
Malta urged to drop libel cases against murdered journalistCommissioner Dunja Mijatovic says that the litigation is an attempt to intimidate Galizia's family.
Scientists in Iceland fuse carbon dioxide into rock in a bid to combat
What is the 'Tetris challenge'?
Albanian ex-minister cleared on drug charges, guilty of abuse of officeAlbanian ex-minister cleared on drug charges, guilty of abuse of office
Vehicle stopped in its tracks by crocodiles lying in the roadA car was stopped in its tracks in Australia's north on Sunday (September 15) by a group of saltwater crocodiles.
The Brief: The EU receives Brexit proposal from Britain
Green new ride: 2020ers race forward with electric cars. Trump has other ideas.The candidates' proposals set up a clash with the president, who has mocked electric cars and tried to deregulate the industry to allow vehicles to pollute more.
Hope for Iceland's melting glaciers as scientists bury carbon
Taliban car bomb kills at least 20 in southern AfghanistanA local official said 20 bodies and 95 wounded had been evacuated from the blast site.
One of Europe's biggest taxi apps has gone carbon neutralRide sharing is huge, what are the major players to cut down their carbon footprint?
Our love of eccentricity means Teflon Boris Johnson will survive Brexit Britain’s collapse ǀ View
Watch: Paris tests 'flying taxi' as future of city transport
'Flying taxi' tested in Paris as city battles congestion & pollution
Climate protesters demonstrate outside Frankfurt car showHundreds of climate protesters blocked the main entrance of Frankfurt's IAA car show on Sunday.
Spain counts the cost of deadly floods in Alicante and Murcia
Girl power goes green: Teens strike for global action on climate change"The world is watching us," said Isabelle Axelsson,18, who has skipped class weekly to march with Fridays for Future in Stockholm.
Luxembourg's PM lays into Johnson after he skips press conference
Sanders cancels three South Carolina campaign events to rest his hoarse voiceThe 78-year-old Vermont senator's voice was raspy during Thursday night's Democratic presidential debate.
Watch: Spanish authorities rescue those stranded by floodwatersTwo rescue operations after flooding in Spain showed Spanish authorities pulling people to safety.
Dramatic baby rescue amid severe flooding in southeastern SpainWorkers battled waist-high floodwaters to get to those who were stranded after two days of torrential rain.
Climate protestors demonstrate at Frankfurt Motor ShowSeveral thousand climate activists protested in Frankfurt on Saturday (September 14) against climate-damaging cars as the city hosts the Frankfurt Motor Show (IAA).
Fridays for Future calls for more action against climate change
Rescue efforts underway in Alicante as roads are submerged in flood waters
Ex-bouncer emerges as torchbearer for secular Israelis ahead of electionsThe former defense minister has tapped into a wellspring of resentment of the ultra-Orthodox, attracting a new base of voters.
Floods in Spain kill at least six peopleAt least six people were killed and more than 3,000 evacuated after two days of severe rain in southeastern Spain.
What was going on between Biden and Castro on health care?The candidates were largely talking past each other: Castro articulated a real divide, but Biden described his plan largely accurately.
Putin critic Navalny says raids carried out against supporters
With confetti and push notifications, stock app Robinhood nudges investors toward risk"I liken it to giving the keys of a sports car to a 12-year-old," said Tara Falcone, a certified financial planner and the founder of ReisUP, a financial education company.
Car chases and stunts as James Bond crew settles into Matera
Gucci goes fully carbon neutral as London Fashion Week commencesThe Italian luxury label makes its biggest sustainable commitment yet, announcing the news on Instagram with a striking, black and white post.
Gun control coalition amps up pressure on corporationsA coalition of gun control advocates issues an open letter asking U.S. companies to break all ties with the NRA.
Five takeaways from Republicans' narrow escape in North Carolina's 9th DistrictIf Trump were to replicate Dan Bishop's performance all over the state next November, he'd clearly lose North Carolina.
'Shame on you': North Carolina GOP votes to override veto while Democrats were absentOne Democratic lawmaker called the move "scorched earth politics."
European carmakers want clarity over Brexit
Artist Refik Anadol is using data from Rolls-Royce to create LED artRolls-Royce Art Programme has commissioned Anadol to create the work using data from the thousands of unique paint colours their customers choose.
There's good news and bad news for the GOP after a narrow North Carolina winFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
Cardiac arrest during business trip sex considered a 'work accident'A Frenchman who died of a cardiac arrest during sex while on a business trip was the victim of a workplace accident ruled a French court.
Watch again: US marks 18 years since September 11 attacks
Sea-Watch captain Carola Rackete honoured for migrant rescue
Rocket blast at U.S. Embassy in Kabul on 9/11 anniversaryIt was the first major attack in the Afghan capital since President Donald Trump abruptly called off U.S.-Taliban talks over the weekend.
In Abaco Islands, the letter D marks the site of a grim recovery effortMore than a week after Hurricane Dorian slammed the Abaco Islands, the search and rescue efforts have shifted to recovering the remains of those killed by storm.
It just got a little easier for low-income women in this Texas city to access abortion careAustin's latest budget includes funds to help women who live there overcome barriers to access, like the cost of travel to and from a clinic.
Voting underway in closely watched North Carolina special electionAfter last year's results were thrown out due to fraud in the 9th Congressional District, Trump's standing is on the line as Democrat Dan McCready takes on Republican Dan Bishop.
House passes $300M bill requiring carbon monoxide detectors in public housingAn NBC News investigation found that at least 13 public housing residents have died from carbon monoxide poisoning since 2003.
Who are the controversial candidates in the new EU Commission?The new EU Commission line-up has been unveiled and among the new faces are some controversial candidates. We look at some of the nominees who might have a hard time when MEPs grill them in the coming weeks.
Frankfurt Auto Show goes greenA stark warning from climate groups including Greenpeace - SUVs should be banned as part of a wider campaign to curb pollution by the auto industry.
Trump says he has fired US national security advisor John Bolton
'Here we go again': Young Americans turn to memes, dark humor in face of recession"A lot of us are in a lot of college debt, jobs are hard to get," said one young person who posted to Twitter about a possible recession.
North Carolina will remain a hot spot through November 2020First Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
QUIZ | How much do you know about sustainability?Climate change trivia is anything but trivial.
Carmakers near CO2 cliff-edge in electrification raceCarmakers near CO2 cliff-edge in electrification race
Trump tests political capital in last-minute North Carolina election pushA loss by Republican Dan Bishop could foreshadow an uphill climb for Republicans in 2020.
Four crew members found alive in capsized cargo ship off US coastThe Golden Ray caught fire and overturned on the St. Simons Sound off the coast of Brunswick, Georgia, around 2 a.m. Sunday.
Tuesday's special election in North Carolina could reveal clues about 2020First Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
North Carolina House race has an unlikely scandal hangoverAhead of Tuesday's election, Democrat Dan McCready is benefiting from a marathon campaign after last year's voter fraud upended the GOP field.
Exploring historic Normandy in château style
Secret Taliban peace talks at Camp David floated, scrapped within a week
'Everything's gone': In Abaco Islands, lives shattered by Hurricane Dorian's devastation
Trump calls off Afghanistan peace talks after bombing in KabulUS President Donald Trump tweeted that he was calling off talks with Afghanistan on Saturday night.
Climate change protesters occupy the red carpet at the Venice Film Festival
Russia and Ukraine carried out a long-awaited prisoner swap
Climate change activists storm red carpet at Venice Film FestivalSeveral hundred demonstrators took over the red carpet at the event where Hollywood stars such as Brad Pitt, Scarlett Johansson and Joaquin Phoenix have premiered their latest films.
Hundreds stranded, 'catastrophic' flooding as Dorian moves off coast"We went from almost no water to 4 to 6 feet in a matter of minutes," said Steve Harris, who lives on Ocracoke Island, North Carolina.
North Carolina coast told to shelter in place as Hurricane Dorian hits"It has only started. We have a long night ahead of us," Gov. Roy Cooper said as Dorian promised life-threatening floods.
Brexit rebel: Boris Johnson's Conservatives 'all over the place'
U.S. service member killed in Kabul suicide blast, official saysThe service member was killed in a car bomb near the U.S. embassy on Thursday, a U.S. official at the NATO-led Resolute Support mission said.
Commuter train and truck in deadly collision in JapanA commuter train and a truck loaded with boxes of citrus collided at a rail crossing near Tokyo on Thursday, killing one and injuring at least 30 people, Japanese authorities said.
European Union member states make preparations for No Deal BrexitAs the European Union steps up contingency plans for a No Deal Brexit, individual member states are also taking steps to deal with the possible fall out.
Lyft fails to protect passengers against sexual assault, harassment, lawsuit claims"There have been many sexual assaults much worse than the ones suffered by plaintiffs ... where victims have been attacked and traumatized," the lawsuit alleges.
161 mph Taycan revealed as Porsche's first electric carFours years on from the Mission E concept, Porsche’s first EV is now ready to go on sale
Hong Kong's Carrie Lam withdraws extradition billThe controversial extradition bill that prompted mass demonstrations in June has been withdrawn, but protesters have other demands.
Hong Kong: Carrie Lam withdraws controversial extradition bill
Mysterious radio bursts from space may soon have an explanation
What the 'Green New Deal' is, and how it would workSee what each candidate has to say on climate change and the environment.
Next generation of electric cars heading to EuropeUS-based brand Karma is set to take on Tesla with its new grand tourer.
Kashmir: The misinformation spreading online | #TheCube
Taliban claims blast in Afghan capital as draft peace deal agreedThe explosion came as a senior U.S. diplomat was visiting Kabul to brief Afghan President Ashraf Ghani on a draft peace accord reached with the insurgents that could see thousands of U.S. troops withdrawn from Afghanistan.
Joe Biden says Trump has 'no intestinal fortitude' on guns, sees 'no compromise' with McConnellMcConnell is "not going to agree ... so we just have to beat him, flat out beat him," Biden said.
Bavarian MPs who don't enforce environmental rules 'could face jail'The European Court of Justice will advise whether to impose heavy penalties over vehicle pollution.
'Get ready' for no deal Brexit, warns government
How do you make a luxury destination zero-carbon?
Texas mass shooting victims include postal worker and truck driver"I don't know what I'm going to do without her," a victim's sister said.
Kevin Hart suffers 'major back injuries' after car crashHart and two others were in the actor's 1970 Plymouth Barracuda when it rolled into a ditch in Malibu, California.
Riot police move in on protests in Hong KongRiot police marched on foot towards the Admiralty district in Hong Kong on Saturday.
The abortion underground: Groups quietly help women who have to travel to access care
5 dead, 21 injured after motorist opens fire in Odessa, Texas"The suspect continued shooting at innocent civilians all over Odessa," police said.
Trump faces more 2020 danger if Democrat scores upset in N. Carolina special electionAnalysis: The closely watched Sept. 10 vote will fill a House seat that is vacant after last year's results were invalidated due to election fraud.
Some Floridians refuse to evacuate as Hurricane Dorian approaches"It's scary as heck," said a woman as female inmates from the Brevard County jail stacked sandbags in the trunk of her car.
Hyperloop ambitions, African free trade and licensing online influencers
British adventurer takes on 100 marathons around Britain barefootAnna McNuff, 34, has challenged herself with running 100 marathons around Britain barefoot. She started the journey in the Shetland Islands, however is currently injured in Manchester after completing 1070 miles so far.
Hong Kong democracy activist Joshua Wong, others arrestedOrganizers of a march scheduled for Saturday also called the demonstration off after an appeals board denied permission for the event.
Passion killer as Marks & Spencer calls time on Porn Star Martini
Uber, Lyft propose $21 an hour minimum wage for drivers in CaliforniaGig economy companies that were once seen as an innovative addition to the labor market have come under growing scrutiny for how they treat their workers.
UK hosts car-jumping championshipsFlying cars might still be the stuff of science fiction, but competitors did their best to defy gravity
Oxfam wants you to 'say no to new' clothes this September#SecondhandSeptember is a campaign being run by the charity to increase awareness of the number of clothes that end up in landfill each year.
Watch: Greta Thunberg arrives in New York on carbon-neutral yachtSwedish teen climate activist Greta Thunberg has just arrived in New York.
Toyota announces 90% of vehicles for 2020 Olympics will be electrifiedThe company is hoping its Olympic and Paralympic fleets will have the lowest emissions ever.
Bangkok street sweeper is carrying her dog to workA Bangkok street sweeper, Thitirat Keowa-ram, has created a phenomenon after a picture of her carrying her dog on her back while sweeping the streets
Congress' demands for nuclear-powered aircraft carriers are sinking the Navy ǀ View
How U.S. ended up targeting a star Google engineerAnthony Levandowski was a rising star in the Bay Area world of engineering who for years pushed computing boundaries of all kinds.
Former Google self-driving car engineer charged with stealing trade secrets
Watch: Coffins to die for from Ghana's master of the craft
Soyuz spacecraft carrying FEDOR the robot docks at ISS on second tryA Soyuz spacecraft carrying a Russian humanoid robot called Fedor has successfully docked with the International Space Station.
Severe storm in Madrid brings hail and flash floodingA severe hailstorm hit Madrid paralysing roads and causing flash flooding.
Flash flooding in Madrid region sweeps away vehiclesVideos taken by Madrid residents on Monday (August 26) show flooded streets in one of the worst affected neighbourhoods, Arganda del Rey, as heavy rains drenched the Spanish capital.
Conflict of interest: How Trump has used his office to benefit his businessFirst Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
Ferdinand Piech, former chairman of Volkswagen, diesThe former head of Volkswagen who expanded the company significantly died at the age of 82.
Want to fight climate change? Start with challenging your mayor and your neighbours to act ǀ View
Revellers enjoy sunshine at hot Notting Hill CarnivalHundreds of thousands of people gathered in the west London district of Notting Hill to celebrate the Notting Hill Carnival, an annual event that which has taken place since 1966.
Can God be found via a carnival ride? The Church of England hopes so."Our hope is that it will bring a very different audience into the cathedral," said Rev. Jane Hedges, dean of Norwich Cathedral.
Protesters march in Bayonne carrying stolen portraits of Macron
Climate activists rally carrying stolen portraits of Macron near G7
Trump arrives at world summit fixated on trade warThe president escalated his trade war with China before leaving Washington. He arrives in Europe angling to start another one.
Explained: The story of Paris' liberation from the Nazis, 75 years on
As Hong Kong protests turn violent, one man fights to preserve shrinking middle ground"It's getting more and more difficult because both sides are developing a stronger and stronger will to contact and engage," Fernando Cheung said.
Eight-year-old clocks 86 mph driving on German autobahn"I only wanted to drive around a bit," the boy said, according to police in Soest, Germany.
A battle over high-tech crime-fighting is dividing one of America's most dangerous citiesDetroit's police chief says facial recognition is making the city safer. Some residents fear it could create a surveillance state.
Watch: Caracas artists reclaim slum spaces from poverty and propaganda
One year of Greta Thunberg, activist and magnet for hope — and hate
German amusement park acts after uproar over 'swastika carousel'An amusement park ride in south-west Germany has been taken out of operation because it looked like two rotating swastikas.
World's largest all-electric ferry sets sail in Denmark
French couple face jail for taking sand from a beach in SardiniaItalian customs have arrested a French couple who wanted to leave the island of Sardinia with 40 kilograms of sand from Chia beach, in the boot of their car.
Watch: Street festival sees creativity with cardboard in Russia
Turkmenistan hosts the 1st Caspian Economic Forum
Climate-friendly policies can succeed in Europe - but not at the expense of workers ǀ View
Watch: Landmark cooling towers destroyed in controlled explosionLandmark Didcot cooling towers destroyed in controlled explosion
Vintage car rally celebrates 1989 Baltic Way human chainVintage cars set out across Baltic states to mark the 30th anniversary of a human chain of over one million people seeking freedom from the USSR.
My discovery of Spain's organic wineI explored a vineyard in Córdoba to learn about Spanish organic wine and why its popularity is increasing.
Why electric cars aren’t as environmentally-friendly as you think
12 envy-inducing looks from the streets of London this weekThere's nothing like summer in the city, someone in a rush next to someone looking pretty.
UK policeman murder investigation: Police search caravan site
There have been three times more wildfires in the EU so far this yearMore than 1,600 wildfires have been recorded so far this year — more than three times the average amount recorded by the same time over the past ten years.
Rare earth elements: The key in the US-China trade warThe US could be in big trouble if China decided to stop exporting rare earth elements.
Will a no-deal Brexit threaten peace in Northern Ireland?
Footballer Sala 'exposed to carbon monoxide' before fatal plane crash
Parts of Genoa bridge lacked maintenance for 25 years — prosecutorOn the anniversary of the Genoa bridge collapse, an expert has told Euronews that maintaining similar older, longer bridges is "not easy" and expensive.
Two people missing after violent storm causes mudslide in Switzerland
Fragments of Boeing 787 fall near Fiumicino airport after take-off
Some signs of normality return to Kashmir, but India's clampdown still strictSome signs of normality return to Kashmir, but India's clampdown still strict
Portugal's fuel-tanker drivers vote to go ahead with strikePortugal's fuel-tanker drivers vote to go ahead with strike
Greece scraps university sanctuary law banning police from campuses
Explosions rock Russian arms depot for second time this weekAn explosion rocked an ammunition plant for the second time this week, injuring at least nine, according to national media reports.
'Flight shame' website spells out emissions toll on global climate'Flight shame' website spells out emissions toll on global climate
Take a 2,000 km 'space flight' over the Siberian wildfiresEuropean agency Copernicus Emergency Management System has provided Euronews with an animation of the ongoing wildfires in Russia's Sakha Republic.
Finnair brings low carbon biofuel to long haul flightsIt is funded by an initiative allowing passengers to donate towards biofuel - which can cost five times more than regular jet fuel.
E-scooter fleets may not be as eco-friendly as you thought—here's why
The long-term strategy to make the EU carbon neutral needs a hard reality check ǀ View
Plane carrying members of singer Pink's team crash lands in Denmark
Viennese say 'no thanks' to citrus and melon scented metro trainsCitrus or rose and melon scented metro trains? 'No thanks,' said the Viennese in an online survey.
New swine fever case in Slovakia as countries try to contain outbreak
'Low chance' Siberia wildfires will be brought under control: expertSiberia's wildfires are only getting bigger despite Russian airforce intervention, Greenpeace Russia warned this week.
Burberry unveils coat collection made from fabric scraps and fish netsThe luxury label moves towards being more sustainable with a new Econyl capsule Collection launched this week.
Pipe-bomb mailer who targeted Trump critics sentenced to 20 yearsThe series of mailed pipe bombs, which prosecutors described in court papers as "a domestic terror attack," spurred a nationwide scare last year.
A 'hero' grandfather, a teen, an Army vet: These are the victims of the El Paso massacreA gunman opened fire at a Walmart Saturday, killing 22.
Tesla-run Porsche 912 proves vintage cars can be converted to electricClassic cars meet electric engines in the new retro-electric trend sweeping the automotive industry.
Sow row as Bulgaria accuses Romanian tourists over African Swine FeverA diplomatic row has broken out between Bulgaria and Romania over African Swine Fever (ASF).
Pakistan calls India's Kashmir decision 'illegal'
Canadian authorities searching river for teen murder suspectsThe suspects are wanted in the killings of three people, including an American woman and her Australian boyfriend.
French inventor Franky Zapata succeeds to cross the English Channel
Uncomfortable travel can be the most rewarding travel - and even the most enjoyable ǀ View
UK Border Force find 60 guns in car arriving in Dover from CalaisBritain's National Crime Agency said the find is believed to be "the largest seizure of lethal purpose weapons at a UK port."
Watch: Frenchman successfully crosses Channel on 'hoverboard'
On the frontline of the Estonia-Latvia booze tax war
Romania minister sacked over 'deeply wrong' comments on kidnapped teenRomania's education minister, Ecaterina Andronescu, has been sacked over "deeply wrong" comments she made about a kidnapping case.
Watch: Small plane makes emergency landing onto US roadA small plane made an emergency landing on a road in the US state of Washington on Thursday and it was captured by a police car's dashboard camera.
Small plane lands on road in Washington stateDrivers  were taken by surprise on Thursday when a small plane made an emergency landing on a busy four-lane road
Floodwaters soak local bus on New York's Staten IslandPassengers seated on the bus had to lift up their legs or stand on seats to avoid getting wet.
Dozens dead after ballistic missile strike, suicide bombings in Yemen
Video shows Oklahoma woman hit with stun gun after kicking officerThe 65-year-old woman refused to sign an $80 ticket for a broken tail light before driving away and resisting arrest, according to the footage.
Plane shaming is real: 5 people travelling the world by rail and roadWe spoke to five people who went against the trend and chose to swap planes and cars for bikes and trains.
'World's first transnational cable car' to connect Russia and ChinaWhat is claimed to be the world's first transnational cable car is set to connect China and Russia across the Amur River.
Scientists develop video game that can be controlled by the mind
Police find Indian coffee shop chain owner's body in riverV.G.Siddhartha, 60, had left Bangalore on Monday and left his car near a bridge in Dakshina Kannada district in Karnataka state.
Cargo craft blasts off  to International Space StationA cargo craft bound for the International Space Station will blast off from Kazakhstan's Baikonur Cosmodrome on Wednesday.
For first time since independence from U.K., Hong Kong charges protesters with riotingThis is the first time since the former British colony returned to Chinese rule in 1997 that its authorities have used rioting charge.
When Cardi B met Bernie: The rapper and Sanders talk 'future of America'Cardi said earlier this month that she had been reading about Sanders and was "really sad how we let him down in 2016."
007 Aston Martin sold at auction
007 Aston Martin sold at auctionThe classic Aston Martin DB5 driven by James Bond in the film Goldfinger has been auctioned in California for 5.77m euros
Families enjoy a bout of box cart racing in La PazHundreds of children and parents who are still young at heart took to the streets of La Paz for a bout of box cart racing on Sunday (July 28)
Over 100 million credit card applicants at risk in Capital One breach, Seattle woman arrestedAbout 140,000 Social Security numbers and 80,000 bank account numbers were potentially put at risk, according to a statement from the bank.
How astronomers missed the huge asteroid that just whizzed past EarthThe sneaky space rock came "uncomfortably close" to our planet.
23 easy things you can do to be more eco nowBeat eco-anxiety with this digestible list of easy things you can do to live a greener life without sacrificing on style and comfort.
The chilling inaction on domestic violence in Russia is endangering women’s lives ǀ View
Quantum tech promises 'unhackable' phones and super-secure networks
1980: Carter vs. Kennedy left African Americans feeling ignoredThe allegiance of black voters was in question, and a geographic divide emerged.
1976: Jimmy Carter begins his marchA decade after the Voting Rights Act, millions of black Americans remained unregistered to vote.
Hungary offers €30,000 to married couples who produce three children
20 killed in attack at Afghan political officeAbout 50 other people were wounded in the attack on Green Trend party headquarters, which included a gunbattle between the attackers and security forces.
How to be a sustainable wedding guestOur top tips for enjoying the wedding season in a creative and eco-friendly way.
Watch: Protesters detained while demanding fair elections in Moscow
Army bomb experts sent to Northern Irish town
Romania's police chief fired after missing girl killed by kidnapperThe chief of the Romanian police Ioan Buda was fired by the Romanian Interior ministry on Saturday after a series of errors in his police department led to their failure to save a missing girl.
Europe's electronic waste ends up at this toxic landfill in Ghana
Watch: Protesters call for free elections at Moscow demonstration
Austrian triathlete frees herself after harrowing kidnappingAustrian cyclist and triathlete Nathalie Birli said she was hit, beaten, and tied up before freeing herself from a kidnapper.
Italy shaken as policeman stabbed to death in Rome
Canadian manhunt: Everything we know about the teens suspected of a killing spreeKam McLeod and Bryer Schmegelsky are suspects in the deaths of American Chynna Deese, her boyfriend, Lucas Fowler, and a botany lecturer named Leonard Dyck.
Two longtime Biden African American supporters in S. Carolina defect to Tim RyanThe state is critical to the former VP's path to winning the Democratic nomination, but some say he's neglected relationships there.
Georgia’s EU bid stepped up with new electric car manufacturing plantThe city of Kutaisi in Georgia hopes to put itself at the forefront of global automobile production with the opening of an electric car factory that plans to produce 40,000 vehicles a year.
Licence To Buy: One of James Bond's Aston Martin DB5s up for sale
Indonesian volcano erupts, spewing ash near third-biggest city
Romania irks EU over controversial export of 70,000 live sheepRomania is going ahead with the controversial export of 70,000 live sheep to the Persian Gulf. That is despite Brussels urging them not to because “extreme temperatures” would make it impossible to guarantee the animals would not suffer in transit.
Senators who visited border asked DHS for improved care of migrantsThe lawmakers cited "serious concerns" about the condition for children at detention centers.
Lush develops new 'Carbon Positive' packagingTaking their commitment beyond carbon neutral, sustainable cosmetic giant Lush has created packaging that aims to reduce environmental carbon.
Austrian triathlete survives abduction, convinces man to free herNathalie Birli, 27, was training with her bicycle on a road in Kumberg in southern Austria on Tuesday afternoon when she was abducted
French carmaker Renault cuts 2019 revenue outlookFrench carmaker Renault cuts 2019 revenue outlook
Arsenal's Ozil and Kolasinac escape knife-wielding attackersArsenal's Ozil and Kolasinac escape knife-wielding attackers
The Brief: Finland works towards goal of carbon neutrality by 2035
Watch | The garden that hasn't been watered in almost 30 years
Another vehicle used by Canadian teens suspected in 3 murders found in flamesCanadian officials said Tuesday that the two teenagers are now being investigated as suspects in at least three murders in the rural British Columbia area.
Boeing's woes, the safety of personal data and cybersecurity concerns
Sliding doors: What May and Johnson's day will look likeBoth May and Johnson will head to Buckingham Palace on Wednesday — one to resign as Prime Minister and one to be anointed new British leader.
Mini brings classic design into the future with all-electric vehicleThe new Mini Electric could signify an revolutionary change for electric vehicles.
Corporate sponsorship of the EU presidency: is there a problem?Previous host Romania was sponsored by Coca-cola among others, while Finland, which took over as the new rotating president on July 1, announced an agreement with BMW.
How to have a flying free holiday and reconnect with natureWe investigate why no-fly holidays in the countryside are good for the planet and your mental health.
Missing teens now suspects in killings of U.S woman, her boyfriend and third personPolice say the teens are no longer missing, but "suspects in the Dease Lake suspicious death and the double homicide of Lucas Fowler and Chynna Deese."
New study throws fuel on the health care debate: Who'll be covered, what's the cost?A plan to open up Medicare to everyone is gaining traction among Democrats. A liberal think tank tried to figure out how much we'll have to pay.
Boris Johnson: Diplomatic disaster, EU basher or reincarnated olive?
Killing of couple in Canada may be linked to missing teens and another death, police sayA burning car belonging to two missing teens and a dead man were found about 300 miles from where a U.S. woman and her Australian boyfriend were found shot dead.
What if you could fuel your car and power your home using plastic?Groundbreaking technology could turn your plastic waste into into energy.
Robotic bartender serves up cocktails for Prague clubbers
Masked men storm train station in Hong KongFootage showed them beating people with wooden dowels in the station and inside a subway car
Hong Kong leader Carrie Lam condemns Sunday's violent clashesHong Kong’s embattled Chief Executive Carrie Lam condemned Sunday night's violent clashes.
Thousands flock to celebrate 100 years of CitroenPeople gathered in the La Ferté Vidame this weekend to celebrate, watch and show off 100 years of Citroen cars.
Protesters attacked, tear-gassed as Hong Kong protest march violentProtesters threw eggs at the central government's Liaison Office and spray-painted its surveillance cameras. China's national emblem was splattered with black ink.
Could electric scooter sharing help large cities become less polluted?
Paris court rules against victims of MS Estonia boat crash
Volvo recalls nearly half a million cars due to safety concernsVolvo is recalling up to half a million vehicles due to safety concerns linked to a manufacturer failure.
Longest ever drive in electric car finishes in New ZealandA journey of a lifetime accomplished today for one Dutch sustainability advocate who was on the road for three years.
Russian Navy carries out missile drills in Sea of Japan
Senators introduce bipartisan bill to require carbon monoxide detectors in public housingThe bill, introduced by Senators Tim Scott, R-S.C., and Bob Menendez, D-N.J., follows an NBC News investigation into carbon monoxide deaths in public housing.
Travel back in time with the 'Google Maps' of Ancient RomeTravelling to the French Riviera from London takes a matter of hours nowadays but it would have taken a minimum of 24 days around 2,000 years ago.
'Democracy is in danger': Fears of right-wing extremism grow in Germany
Sex assault case against Kevin Spacey droppedCape & Islands District Attorney Michael O'Keefe cited "unavailability of the complaining witness" in filing for dismissal.
Perfect performance as Nasser Al-Attiyah wins 2019 Silk Way Rally
Democrats are replaying the 2016 health care wars ahead of 2020First Read is your briefing from "Meet the Press" and the NBC Political Unit on the day's most important political stories and why they matter.
How do big cars create small emissions?
Elon Musk wants to hook your brain up directly to computersThe Tesla and SpaceX founder announced a goal of implanting chips into human brains as early as next year to create direct human connections to computers.
American scientist found dead in Greece had multiple broken bones, found in ventilation drainSuzanne Eaton, 59, was discovered July 8 in an abandoned World War II bunker in a rural area outside the city of Chania.
Victory for Britain's Sam Sunderland in Silk Way Rally bikes category
Is linen the new cotton?Linen is a fabric that has been manufactured for thousands of years but its eco-friendly credentials be the answer to modern fashion sustainability.
Hip-hop festival evacuated as nearby forest fire threatened revellersPolice advised organisers to act after heavy winds threatened to push the blaze closer to the festival site on the island of Pag.
Democrats duel over health care in new campaign dust upBiden and Sanders are locking horns in a high-profile skirmish over Obamacare and Medicare for All.
Drivers and riders do battle on penultimate stage of Silk Way Rally
Floods hit western Greece days after deadly storm killed 7Floods hit western Greece days after deadly storm killed 7
Going fishing: Kids 10 to 14 take 600-mile road trip before being stopped by Aussie policePolice did not know if the children were related or how they knew each other.
Nine dead after small plane carrying parachutists crashes in SwedenSwedish officials said a small plane carrying parachutists crashed in Sweden soon after takeoff on Sunday and all nine people on board were killed.
EU nations issue statement over fears the Iran nuclear deal could fail
Democrats have plans that 'grim reaper' Mitch McConnell won't be able to blockBut the use of executive authority has been criticized by members of both parties as a power grab that wrongly sidelines Congress.
Sand dunes challenge drivers and riders on Stage 8 of Silk Way Rally
Canadian-Somali journalist killed in terror attack mourned as a 'big loss'"Everybody is crying for her," Amal Nalayeh, who lives in Canada, told NBC News of her sister.
Amid 'race card' allegations, Pelosi teaches Ocasio-Cortez a math lessonAnalysis: The more the New York lawmaker lashes out over the limits of her own influence, the more obvious those limits become — and the more the imbalance of power tilts in the speaker's direction.
Huge New York power cut leaves Broadway, Times Square in darkA massive power cut crippled the tourist-filled heart of Manhattan for several hours on Saturday, cancelling Broadway shows and halting subway lines.
Car bomb and all-night hotel siege kill 26 in Somalia's KismayoKenyans, Americans, a Briton and Tanzanians were among 26 people killed when Islamist gunmen stormed a hotel in the Somali port city of Kismayo, officials said on Saturday.
At least 1 American among the 27 dead in hotel terrorist attack in Somalia
Cars, trucks and bikes brace for battle as Silk Way Rally enters China
'Manhattanhenge': Streets align as New York enjoys spectacular sunsetPeople in Manhattan got to see a fantastic Manhattanhenge sunset Friday night (12 July 2019)
That's when the grid of Manhattan streets lines up perfectly with the setting sun.
Death toll in hotel attack in Somalia's Kismayo jumps to 26 - regional presidentDeath toll in hotel attack in Somalia's Kismayo jumps to 26 - regional president
Dozens dead after Somali forces end hotel siegeAt least 26 people were killed, including a prominent Canadian-Somali journalist and several foreigners, officials said.
Navigation problems shake things up during Stage 6 of Silk Way Rally
Driverless cars: Unique challenges posed on European roads
Bentley unveils 'future of luxury' self-driving carThe car maker debuted the new concept to mark its 100th birthday.
Arrests as Algeria football fans toast team's Africa Cup progressArrests marred celebrations in Paris after Algeria's footballers defeated the Ivory Coast on penalties to qualify for the Africa Cup of Nations semi-finals.
Riders and drivers do battle during tough Stage 5 of Silk Way Rally
Meet the women making a mark at the 2019 Summer Universiade in NaplesAs Naples hosted the 2019 Summer Universiade — the 60th anniversary of the international multi-sport event organized for university athletes — Euronews spoke to three women who have made their mark on the competition for different reasons.
Afghanistan: What is the humanitarian cost of a never-ending war?With a growing number of attacks and civilian casualties. The conflict in Afghanistan is intensifying even 18 years after U.S. intervention. But what is the humanitarian cost?
20 Bags to Carry you to Work and Beyond20 of our favourite sustainably made commuter bags on the market.
Europe's Vega rocket lost after launchA European Vega rocket carrying a satellite for the United Arab Emirates has been lost after launching on Wednesday.
Tough fourth stage takes toll on drivers and riders at Silk Way Rally
Spanish court rules Julio Iglesias is father of 43-year-old manThe ruling is the latest in a decades-long paternity dispute between the Spanish crooner and Javier Sanchez-Sanchos.
Driver killed as rains cause flash floods in Spain
Germany, France agreed to back Carney to head IMF - Frankfurter AllgemeineGermany, France agreed to back Carney to head IMF - Frankfurter Allgemeine
Dusty trails and tricky navigation during Stage 3 of Silk Way Rally
France 'will introduce eco-tax' on flights out of France
Watch: Unexpected flooding turns deadly in northeastern SpainTorrential rain and hail brought unexpected flooding to parts of northeastern Spain on Monday evening, killing at least one person.
Extradition bill which sparked mass protests in Hong Kong 'is dead'
US state not doing enough to fix earthquake-vulnerable buildings"I don't want to frighten people," one expert said. "But I think it's important to be transparent. This is a real issue."
Woman who encouraged boyfriend's suicide, appeals to Supreme CourtLawyers for Carter argued that her conviction violated her constitutional right to freedom of speech.
Kevin Spacey accuser pleads Fifth on missing phoneThe Oscar winner has been charged for an alleged groping incident at a bar in Nantucket in 2016 .
Health vs cars: judge reinstates Madrid's low emissions zone
Stony roads and mountain paths take first toll on Silk Way Rally
Metals and minerals deficit undermines Europe's environmental ambitions
Tray-carrying festival in Portuguese town keeps up Christian tradition
Air pollution:Vehicles to be fined again for entering parts of Madrid
Biden's post-debate South Carolina support: Strong — but not certainAmid signs some black voters may be rethinking their support, party leaders in the state say that it will take more than a few bad news cycles for Biden to lose serious ground.
A Rolls-Royce road trip featuring Champagne chests and Jay Z
2019 Silk Way Rally underway as mud and rain provide extra challenge
Couples compete in wife-carrying championshipsA Lithuanian man and his wife have won the world 'wife carrying' title, leaping over timber and wading through waist-high water to beat dozens of other couples for a second year running.
16,000 evacuated in Frankfurt to defuse WWII bomb16,000 people were evacuated from an area of Frankfurt to allow for an unexploded WWII bomb to be defused.
Taliban car bomb kills at least 14 as group holds peace talks in QatarA Taliban attack on a government security compound in central Afghanistan on Sunday killed at least eight security personnel, six civilians and wounded more than 180, officials said, as rival Afghan groups met in Qatar to discuss peace.
Electric air taxis powered by hydrogen promise greater range for intercity commutesThe new vehicles could be in production in the United States by 2021, but would need FAA approval.
Green Guide: Freiburg, a German gemA tour of one of the world's most forward-looking, innovative green cities.
France: 74 women killed by their partners so far in 2019
Watch: Thousands take to streets of British capital for Pride Parade
High-tech thermal cameras could protect whales from deadly collisions with shipsAbout 1,200 ship strikes were reported between 2007 and 2016, but a new detection system may help to keep these mammals safe.
Is the world of finance ready to go green?
What are some Middle East inventions that helped shape the world?Since the beginning of humankind, inventions have helped move civilizations forward, with many creations coming from Middle East and North Africa.
Car bombing in southern Turkey kills three SyriansA bomb inside a vehicle exploded in the Turkish town of Reyhanli on Friday, killing three people - two of which were Syrian passengers.
Thousands celebrate as Sudan civilian and military groups reach power-sharing deal
We tried a new train journey that can take you into the past
Sudan military council, opposition reach power-sharing agreement
Georgian city launches electric car factoryGeorgia's second largest city, Kutaisi, will soon launch a factory for electric cars.
9 sustainable economy startups aiming to clean up our future
Boat carrying 70 migrants capsizes off Tunisian coastBoat carrying 70 migrants capsizes off Tunisian coast
Why was there a spike in pollution during the European heatwave?
